[501]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Trim closely the moustache, and grow beard, and thus act against the fire-worshippers.
[502]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be npon him) said: Ten are the acts according to fitra : clipping the moustache, letting the beard grow, using the tooth-stick, snuffing water in the nose, cutting the nails, washing the finger joints, plucking the hair under the armpits, shaving the pubes and cleaning one's private parts with water. The narrator said : I have forgotten the tenth, but it may have been rinsing the mouth.
[503]
This hadith has been narrated by Mus'ab b. Shaiba with the same chain of transmitters except for these words: "His father said : I forgot the tenth one."
[504]
Salman reported that it was said to him: Your Apostle (may peace be upon him) teaches you about everything, even about excrement. He replied: Yes, he has forbidden us to face the Qibla at the time of excretion or urination, or cleansing with right hand or with less than three pebbles, or with dung or bone.
[505]
Salman said that (one among) the polytheists remarked: I see that your friend even teaches you about the excrement. He replied; Yes, he has in fact forbidden us that anyone amongst us should cleanse himself with his right hand, or face the Qibla. He has forbidden the use of dung or bone for it, and he has also instructed us not to use less than three pebbles (for this purpose).
[506]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade the use of bone or the droppings of camels for wiping (after excretion).
[507]
Abu Ayyub reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Whenever you go to the desert, neither turn your face nor turn your back towards the Qibla while answering the call of nature, but face towards the east or the west. Abu Ayyub said: When we came to Syria we found that the latrines already built there were facing towards the Qibla. We turned our faces away from them and begged forgiveness of the Lord. He said: Yes.
[508]
Abu Huraira said:When any one amongst you squats for answering the call of nature, he should neither turn his face towards the Qibla nor turn his back towards it.
[509]
Wasi' b. Habban reported: I was offering my prayer in the mosque and Abdullah b. Umar was sitting there reclining with his back towards the Qibla. After completing my prayer. I went to him from one side. Abdullah said: People say when you go to the latrine, you should neither turn your face towards the Qibla nor towards Bait-ul-Maqdis. 'Abdullah said (farther) : I went up to the roof of the house and saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) squatting on two bricks for relieving himself with his face towards Bait-al-Maqdis.
[510]
Abdullah b. Umar said: I went up to the roof of the house of my sister Hafsa and saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) relieving himself facing Syria. with his back to the Qibla.
[511]
Abu Qatada reported it from his father: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: None of you should hold penis with his right hand while urinating, or wipe himself with his right hand in privy and should not breathe into the vessel (from which he drinks).
[512]
Abu Qatada reported it from his father that the Messenger of Allah(may peace be upon him) said: When anyone amongst you enters the privy he should not touch his penis with his right hand.
[513]
Aba Qatada reported : The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) forbade (us) to breathe into the venel, to touch the penis with the right hand and to wipe after relieving with right hand.
[514]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) loved to start from the right-hand side for performing ablution, for combing (the hair) and wearing the shoes.
[515]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) loved to start from the right-hand side in his every act i.e. in wearing shoes, in combing (his hair) and in performing ablution.
[516]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Be on your guard against two things which provoke cursing. They (the companions present there) said: Messenger of Allah, what are those things which provoke cursing? He said: Easing on the thoroughfares or under the shades (where they take shelter and rest).
[517]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered an enclosure while a servant was following him with a jar of water and he was the youngest amongst us and he placed it by the side of a lote-tree. When the Messenger of Allah,(may peace be upon him) relieved himself, he came out and had cleansed himself with water.
[518]
Anas b. Malik reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered the privy, a servant and I used to carry a skin of water, and a pointed staff, and he would cleanse himself with water.
[519]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went to a far-off place in the desert (hidden from the sight of human beings) for relieving himself. Then I brought water for him and he cleansed himself.
[520]
Hummam reported: Jarir urinated, then performed ablution and wiped over the socks. It was said to him: Do you do like this? He said: Yes, I saw that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) urinated, then performed ablution and then wiped over his shoes. A'mash said: Ibrahim had observed that this hadith was a surprise for them (the people) because Jarir had embraced Islam after the revelation of Surat al-Ma'ida.
[521]
This hadith is narrated on the same authority from A'mash by another chain of transmitters like one transmitted by Abu Mu'awyia. The hadith reported by 'Isa and Sufyan has these words also: "This hadith surprised the friends of Abdullab'" for Jarir had embraced Islam after the revelation of al-Ma'ida.
[522]
Hudhaifa reported: I was with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) when he came to the dumping ground of filth belonging to a particular tribe. He urinated while standing, and I went aside. He (the Holy Prophet) asked me to come near him and I went so near to him that I stood behind his heels. He then performed ablution and wiped over his socks.
[523]
Abu Wa'il reported : Abu Musa inflicted extreme rigour upon himself in the matter of urination and urinated in a bottle and said: When the skin of anyone amongst the people of Israel was besmeared with urine, he cut that portion with a cutter. Hudhaifa said: I wish that'your friend should not inflict such an extreme rigour. I and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) were going together till we reached the dumping ground of filth behind an enclosure. He stood up as one among you would stand up. and he urinated, I tried to turn away from him, but he beckoned to me, so I went to him and I stood behind him, till he had relieved himself.
[524]
The son of Mughira b. Shu'ba reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out for relieving himself. Mughira went with him carrying a jug full of water. When he (the Holy Prophet) came back after relieving himself, he poured water over him and he performed ablution and wiped over his socks; and in the narration of Ibn Rumh there is "till" instead of "when".
[525]
This hadith has been transmitted with the same chain of transmitters by Yahya b. Sa'id with the addition of these words: "He washed his face and hands, and wiped his head and then wiped his socks."
[526]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported: I was with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one night. He came down (from the ride) and relieved himself. He then came and I poured water upon him from the jar that I carried with me. He performed ablution and wiped over his socks.
[527]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported: I was in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey when he said : Mughira take hold of this jar (of water). I took hold of it and I went out with him. (I stopped but) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) proceeded on till he was out of my sight. He relieved himself and then came back and he was wearing a tight-sleeved Syrian gown. He tried to get his forearms out. but the sleeve of the gown was very narrow, so he brought his hands out from under the gown. I poured water over (his hands) and he performed ablution for prayer, then wiped over his socks and prayed.
[528]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out for relieving himself. When he came back I brought for him a jar (of water) and poured water upon his hands and He washed his face. He tried to wash his forearms, but as the (sleeves of the) gown were tight. He, therefore, brought them out from under the gown. He then washed them, wiped his head, and wiped his socks and then prayed.
[529]
'Urwa b. Mughira reported his father having said: I was one night with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey. He said to me: Have you any water with you? I said: Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) came down from his ride and went on till he disappeared in the darkness of night. He then came back and I poured water for him from the jar. He washed his face, He had a woollen gown on him and he could not bring out his forearms from it (i.e. from its sleeves) and consequently he brought them out from under his gown. He washed his forearms, wiped over his head. I then bent down to take off his socks. But he said: Leave them, for my feet were clean when I put them in, and he only wiped over them.
[530]
'Urwah al Mughira reported it from his father: He(Mughira) helped the Apostle (may peace be upon him) in performing the ablution, and he performed it and wiped over his shoes. He (Mughira) said to him (about the washing of the feet after putting them off), but he (the Holy Prophet) said : I put them (feet) in when these were clean.
[531]
'Urwa b. al Mughira b. Shu'ba reported it on the authority of his father that he said : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) lagged behind (in a journey) and I also lagged behind along with him. After having relieved himself he said : Have you any water with you ? I brought to him a jar of water ; he washed his palms, and face, and when he tried to get his forearms out (he could not) for the sleeve of the gown was tight. He, therefore, brought them out from under the gown and, throwing it over his shoulders, he washed his forearm. He then wiped his forelock and his turban and his socks. He then mounted and I also mounted (the ride) and came to the people. They had begun the prayer with 'Abd ar-Rabmin b. 'Anf leading them and had completed a rak'a. When he perceived the presence of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) he began to retire. He (the Holy Prophet) signed to him to continue and offered prayer along with them. Then when he had pronounced the salutation, the Apostle (may peace be upon him) got up and I also got up with him, and we offered the rak'a which had been finished before we came.
[532]
Ibn Mughira narrated it from his father: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) wiped over his socks and over his forehead and over his turban.
[533]
This hadith has been transmitted by Ibn Mughira on the authority of his father by another chain of transmitters.
[534]
Bakr reported that he had heard from the son of Mughira that verily the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) performed ablution and wiped over his forehead and wiped over his turban and over his socks.
[535]
It is narrated from Bilal that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) wiped over the socks and turban, and in the hadith transmitted by 'Isa b. Yaunus the words are: "Bilal narrated it to me."
[536]
This tradition is transmitted by A'mash with this addition; ,I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[537]
Shuraih b. Hani said: I came to 'A'isha to ask her about wiping over the socks. She said: You better ask ('Ali) son of Abu Talib for he used to travel with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). We asked him and he said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stipulated (the upper limit) of three days and three nights for a traveller and one day and one night for the resident.
[538]
This hadith is narrated by Ubaidullah b. 'Amr and Zaid b. Abu Unaisa with the same chain of transmitters.
[539]
Shuraib b. Hani reported: I asked 'A'isha about wiping over the shoes. She said: You better go to 'Ali, for he knows more about this than I. I, therefore, came to 'Ali and he narrated from the Apostle (may peace be upon him) like this.
[540]
Sulaiman b. Buraida narrated it from his father that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) offered prayers with one ablution on the day of the Conquest (of Mecca) and wiped over the socks. 'Umar said to him: You have today done something that you have not been accustomed to before. He (the Holy Prophet) said: 0 'Umar, I have done that on purpose.
[541]
Abu Huraira said: When anyone amongst you wakes up from sleep, he must not put his hand in the utensil till he has washed it three times, for he does not know where his hand was during the night.
[542]
This hadith is transmitted from Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[543]
Zahri and Ibn Musayyab have both transmitted a hadith like this from Abu Huraira who narrated it from the Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[544]
Abu Huraira reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When anyone amongst you wakes up from sleep, he should wash his hands three times before putting it in the utensil, for he does not know wher.. his hand was during the night.
[545]
This hadith has been transmitted through other chains of transmitters on the authority of Abu Huraira in which it is reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) made a mention of washing the hand, and did not instruct to wash it three times. But the hadith narrated from Jabir and Ibn Musayyab. Abu Salama, and Abdullah b. Shaqiq, Abu Salih, Abla Razin, there is a mention of "three times".
[546]
Abu Huraira reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) to have said: When a dog licks a utensil belonging to any one of you, (the thing contained in it) should be thrown away and then (the utensil) should be washed seven times.
[547]
This hadith has been transmitted by another chain of transmitters in which there is no mention of "throwing away".
[548]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When a dog drinks out of a vessel belonging to any one of you, he must wash it seven times.
[549]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The purification of the utensil belonging to any one of you, after it is licked by a dog, lies in washing it seven times, using sand for the first time.
[550]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported : Of the a hadith narrated by Abu Huraira from Muhammad, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), one is this: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : The purification of the utensil belonging to one amongst you, after it is licked by a dog, lies in washing it seven times.
[551]
Ibn Mughaffal reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered killing of the dogs, and then said : What about them, i.e. about other dogs? and then granted concession (to keep) the dog for hunting and the dog for (the security) of the herd, and said: When the dog licks the utensil, wash it seven times, and rub it with earth the eighth time.
[552]
A hadith like this has been narrated from Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters except for the fact that in the hadith transmitted by Yahya those words are: "He (the Holy Prophet) gave concession in the case of the dog for looking after the herd, for hunting and for watching the cultivated land," and there is no mention of this addition (i.e. concession in case of watching the cultivated lands) except in the hadith transmitted by Yahya.
[553]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade to urinate in stagnant water.
[554]
Abu Huraira reported: the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: None amongst you should urinate in standing water, and then wash in it.
[555]
Hammam b. Munabbih said: Of the ahadith narrated to us by Abfi Huraira from Muhammad the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one is this: The Messenger or Allah (may peace be upon him) said: You should not urinate in standing water, that is not flowing, then wash in it.
[556]
Abu Huraira reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying : None of you must wash in standing water when he is in a state of Junub. And Abu Huraira was asked how it was to be done; he said: It was to be taken out in handfuls.
[557]
Anas reported: A Bedouin urinated in the mosque. Some of the persons stood up (to reprimand him or to check him from doing so), but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Leave him alone; don't interrupt him. He (the narrator) said: And when he had finished, he called for a bucket of water and poured it over.
[558]
Anas b. Malik narrated that a desert Arab (Bedouin) stood in a corner of the mosque and urinated there. The people (the Companions of the Holy Prophet who were present there) shouted, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Leave him alone. When he had finished, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered that a bucket (of water) should be brought and poured over it.
[559]
Anas b. Malik reported: While we were in the mosque with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), a desert Arab came and stood up and began to urinate in the mosque. The Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Stop, stop, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : Don't interrupt him; leave him alone. They left him alone, and when he finished urinating, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called him and said to him: These mosques are not the places meant for urine and filth, but are only for the remembrance of Allah, prayer and the recitation of the Qur'an, or Allah's Messenger said something like that. He (the narrator) said that he (the Holy Prophet) then gave orders to one of the people who brought a bucket of water and poured It over.
[560]
A'isha, the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Babies were brought to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he blessed them, and after having chewed (something, e.g. dates or any other sweet thing) he rubbed there with their soft palates. A baby was brought to him and he passed water over him (over his garment), so he asked water to be brought and sprinkled it, but he did not wash it.
[561]
A'isha reported: A suckling babe was brought to the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) and he urinated in his tap. He (the Holy Prophet) sent for water and poured it over.
[562]
Hisham narrated the hadith like one transmitted by Ibn Numair (the above mentioned one) with the same chain of transmitters.
[563]
Umm Qais daughter of Mihsan reported that she came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with her child. who was not yet weaned, and she placed him in his lap; and he urinated in his (Holy Prophet's) lap. He (the Holy Prophet) did nothing more than spraying water over it.
[564]
This hadith has also been narrated from al-Zuhri with the same chain of narrators. (but for the words): "He (the Holy Prophet) sent for water and sprinkled it over."
[565]
Ubaidullah b. Abdullah b. 'Utba b. Mas'ud said: Umm Qais, daughter of Mihsan, was among the earliest female emigrants who took the oath of allegiance to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and she was the sister of 'Ukkasha b. Mihsan, one amongst the sons of Asad b. Khuzaima. He (the narrator) said: She (Umm Qais) told me that she came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) with her son and he had not attained the age of eating food. He (the narrator, 'Ubaidullah), said: She told me that her son passed urine in the lap of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent for water and sprayed it over his garment (over that part which was contaminated with the urine of the child) and he did not wash it thoroughly.
[566]
Alqama and Aswad reported: A person stayed in the house of A'isha and in the morning began to wash his garment. A'isha said: In case you saw it (i.e. drop of semen), it would have served the purpose (of purifying the garment) if you had simply washed that spot; and in case you did not see it, it would have been enough to sprinkle water around it, for when I saw that on the garment of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). I simply scraped it off and he offered prayer, while putting that on.
[567]
Al-Aawad and Hammam reported A'isha as saying: I used to scrape off the (drop of) semen from the garment of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[568]
Qutaiba b. Sa'id, Ishaq b. Ibrahim, Ibn Abi 'Aruba, Abu Ma'shar, Abu Bakr b. Abu Shaiba, Mansur and Mughira have all transmitted from Ibrahim, who transmitted it on the authority of A'isha's narration pertaining to the scraping off of the (drop) of semen from the garment of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) like the hadith of Khalid on the authority of Abu Ma'shar.
[569]
Hammam narrated the hadith from A'isha like the (above-mentioned)traditions.
[570]
'Amr b. Maimun said: I asked Sulaiman b. Yasir whether the semen that gets on to the garment of a person should be washed or not. He replied : A'isha told me: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) washed the semen, and then went out for prayer in that very garment and I saw the mark of washing on it.
[571]
Abu Kuraib, Ibn al-Mubarak, Ibn Abu Za'ida all of them narrated from Amr b. Maimun with the same chain of transmitters. Ibn Abu Za'ida narrated as was transmitted from Ibn Bishr that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) washed semen, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Mabarak and Abdul Wahid the words are: "She (A'isha) reported: I used to wash it from the garment of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[572]
Abdullah b. Shihab al-Khaulani reported: I stayed in the house of 'A'isha and had a wet dream (and perceived its effect on my garment), so (in the morning) I dipped both (the clothes) in water. This (act of mine) was watched by a maid-servant of A'isha and she informed her. She (Hadrat A'isha) sent me a message: Whatprompted you to act like this with your clothes? He (the narrator) said: I told that I saw in a dream what a sleeper sees. She said: Did you find (any mark of the fluid) on your clothes? I said: No. She said: Had you found anything you should have washed it. Incase I found that (semen) on the garment of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) dried up, I scraped it off with my nails.
[573]
Asma (daughter of Abu Bakr) reported: A woman came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: What should one do if the blood of menses smears the garment of one amongst us? He (the Holy Prophet) replied: She should scrape it, then rub it with water, then pour water over it and then offer prayer in it.
[574]
This tradition is narrated by Abu Kuraib, Ibn Numair, Abu Tahir, Ibn Wahb, Yahya b. 'Abdullah b. Salim, Malik b. Anas, 'Amr b. Harith on the authority of Hisham b. 'Urwa, with the same chain of transmitters like one transmitted by Yahya b. Sa'id like the above-mentioned.
[575]
Ibn Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by two graves and said: They (their occupants) are being tormented, but they are not tormented for a grievous sin. One of them carried tales and the other did not keep himself safe from being defiled by urine. He then called for a fresh twig and split it into two parts, and planted them on each grave and then said: Perhaps, their punishment way be mitigated as long as these twigs remain fresh.
[576]
This hadith is transmitted from A'mash by Abmad b. Yusuf al-Azdi, Mu'alla b. Asad, Abd al-Wahid, Sulaiman with the same chain of transmitters but for the words: "The other did not keep himself safe from being defiled by urine."
[577]
'A'isha reported: When anyone amongst us (amongst the wives of the Holy Prophet) menstruated, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked her to tie a waist-wrapper over her (body) and then embraced her.
[578]
'A'isha reported: When anyone amongst us was menstruating the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked her to tie waist-wrapper daring the time when the menstrual blood profusely flowed and then embraced her ; and she ('A'isha) observed: And who amongst you can have control over his desires as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had over his desires.
[579]
Maimuna (the wife of the Holy Prophet) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) contacted and embraced his wives over the waist-wrapper when they were menstruating.
[580]
Kuraibthe freed slave of Ibn Abbas, reported: I heard it from Maimuna, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to lie with me when I menstruated, and there was a cloth between me and him.
[581]
Umm Salama reported: While I was lying with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in a bed cover I menstruated, so I slipped away and I took up the clothes (which I wore) in menses. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : Have you menstruated ? I said: Yes. He called me and I lay down
[582]
It is reported from 'A'isha that she observed: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in I'tikaf, he inclined his head towards me and I combedhis hair, and he did not enter the house but for the natural calls (for relieving himself).
[583]
'Amra daughter of 'Abd al-Rahman reported : 'A'isha, wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed : When I was (in I'tikaf), I entered the house for the call of nature, and while passing I inquired after the health of the sick (in the. family), and when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was (in I'tikaf), he put out his head towards me, while he himself was in the mosque, and I combed his hair; and he did not enter the house except for the call of nature so long as he was In I'tikaf; and Ibn Rumh stated: As long as they (the Prophet and his wives) were among the observers of I'tikaf.
[584]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle (may peace he upon him), reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) put out from the mosque his head for me as he was in I'tikaf, and I washed it in the state that I was menstruating.
[585]
'Urwa reported it from 'A'isha that she observed: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) inclined his head towards me (from the mosque) while I was in my apartment and I combed it in a state of menstruation.
[586]
Al-Aswad narrated it from 'A'isha that she observed : I used to wash the head of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), while I was in a state of menstruation.
[587]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: Get me the mat from the mosque. I said: I am menstruating. Upon this he remarked: Your menstruation is not in your hand.
[588]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered me that I should get him the mat from the mosque. I said: I am menstruating. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Do get me that, for menstruation is not in your hand.
[589]
Abu Huraira reported: While the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in the mosque, he said: O 'A'isha, get me that garment. She said: I am menstruating. Upon this he remarked: Your menstruation is not in your hand, and she, therefore, got him that.
[590]
'A'isha reported: I would drink when I was menstruating, then I would hand it (the vessel) to the Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he would put his mouth where mine had been, and drink, and I would eat flesh from a bone when I was menstruating, then hand it over to the Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he would put his mouth where mine had been. Zuhair made no mention of (the Holy Prophet's) drinking.
[591]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would recline in my lap when I was menstruating, and recite the Qur'an.
[592]
Thabit narrated it from Anas: Among the Jews, when a woman menstruated, they did not dine with her, nor did they live with them in their houses; so the Companions of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) asked The Apostle (may peace be upon him), and Allah, the Exalted revealed: "And they ask you about menstruation; say it is a pollution, so keep away from woman during menstruation" to the end (Qur'an, ii. 222). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do everything except intercourse. The Jews heard of that and said: This man does not want to leave anything we do without opposing us in it. Usaid b. Hudair and Abbad b. Bishr came and said: Messenger of Allah, the Jews say such and such thing. We should not have, therefore, any contactwith them (as the Jews do). The face of the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) underwent such a change that we thought he was angry with them, but when they went out, they happened to receive a gift of milk which was sent to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). He (the Holy Prophet) called for them and gave them drink, whereby they knew that he was not angry with them.
[593]
'Ali reported: I was one whose prostatic fluid flowed readily and I was ashamed to ask the Apostle (may peace be upon him) about it, because of the position of his daughter. I, therefore, asked Miqdad.b. al-Asad and he inquired of him (the Holy Prophet). He (the Holy Prophet) said: He should wash his male organ and perform ablution.
[594]
'Ali reported: I felt shy of asking about prostatic fluid from the Apostle (may peace be upon him) because of Fatimah. I, therefore, asked al-Miqdad (to ask on my behalf) and he asked. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Ablution is obligatory in such a case.
[595]
Ibn 'Abbas reported it from 'Ali: We sent al-Miqdad b. al-Aswad to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) to ask him what must be done about prostatic fluid which flows from (the private part of) a person. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Perform ablution and wash your sexual organ.
[596]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Apostle (may peace be upon him) woke up at night; relieved himself, and then washed his face and hands and then again slept.
[597]
'A'isha reported: Whenever the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) intended to sleep after having sexual intercourse, he performed ablution as for the prayer before going to sleep.
[598]
'A'isha reported: Whenever the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had sexual intercourse and intended to eat or sleep, he performed the ablution of prayer.
[599]
This hadith has been transmitted by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters. Ibn at-Muthanna said in his narration: AI-Hakam narrated to us who heard from Ibrahim narrating that.
[600]
Ibn 'Umar reported: Umar said: Is one amongst us permitted to sleep in a state of impurity (i.e. after having sexual intercourse)? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Yes, after performing ablution.
[601]
Ibn 'Umar said: 'Umar asked the verdict of the Shari'ah from the Apostle (may peace be upon him) thus: Is it permissible for any one of us to sleep in a state of impurity? He (the Holy Prophet said: Yes, he must perform ablution and then sleep and take a bath when he desires.
[602]
Ibn Umar reported: Umar b. al-Khattab said to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), that he became Junbi during the night. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: Perform ablution, wash your sexual organ and then go to sleep.
[603]
'Abdullah b. Abu'l-Qais reported: I asked 'A'isha about the Witr (prayer) of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and made mention of a hadith, then I said: What did he do after having sexual intercourse ? Did he take a bath before going to sleep or did he sleep before taking a bath? She said: He did all these. Some- times he took a bath and then slept, and sometimes he performed ablution only and went to sleep. I (the narrator) said: Praise be to Allah Who has made things easy (for human beings).
[604]
This hadith has been transmitted with the same chain of transmitters from Mu'awyia b. Salih by Zuhair b. Harb, 'Abd al-Rahman b. Mahdi, Harun b. Sa'id al-'Aili and Ibn Wahb.
[605]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When anyone amongst you has sexual intercourse with his wife and then he intends to repeat it, he should perform ablution . In the hadith transmitted by Abu Bakr. (the words are): "Between the two (acts) there should be an ablution," or he (the narrator) said: "Then he intended that it should be repeated."
[606]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to have sexual intercourse with his wives with a single bath.
[607]
Anas b. Malik reported: Umm Sulaim who was the grandmother of Ishaq came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the presence of 'A'isha and said to him: Messenger of Allah, in case or woman sees what a man sees in dream and she experiences in dream what a man experiences (i.e. experiences orgasm)? Upon this 'A'isha remarked: O Umm Sulaim, you brought humiliation to women;may your right hand be covered with dust. He (the Holy Prophet) said to 'A'isha: Let your hand be covered with dust, and (addressing Umm Sulaim) said: Well, O Umm Sulaim, she should take a bath if she sees that (i.e. she experiences orgasm in dream).
[608]
Anas b. Malik reported that Umm Sulaim narrated it that she asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) about a woman who sees in a dream what a man sees (sexual dream). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon bi m) said: In case a woman sees that, she must take a bath. Umm Sulaim said: I was bashful on account of that and said: Does it happen ? Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Yes (it does happen), otherwise how can (a child) resemble her ? Man's discharge (i.e. sperm) is thick and white and the discharge of woman is thin and yellow; so the resemblance comes from the one whose genes prevail or dominate.
[609]
Anas b. Malik reported : A woman asked the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) about a woman who sees in her dream what a man sees in his dream (sexual dream). He (the Holy Prophet) said : If she experiences what a man experiences, she should take a bath.
[610]
Umm Salama reported: Umm Sulaim went to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Apostle of Allah, Allah is not ashamed of the truth. Is bathing necessary for a woman when she has a sexual dream? Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Yes, when she sees the liquid (vaginal secretion). Umm Salama said : Messenger of Allah, does a woman have sexual dream ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Let your hand be covered with dust, in what way does her child resemble her ?
[611]
This hadith with the same sense (as narrated above) bus been transmitted from Hisham b. 'Urwa with the same chain of narrators but with this addition that she (Umm Salama) said: "You humiliated the women.
[612]
'A'isha the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) narrated: Umm Sulaim, the mother of Bani Abu Talha, came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and a hadith (like that) narrated by Hisham was narrated but for these words. A'isha said: I expressed disapproval to her, saying : Does a woman see a sexual dream ?
[613]
It is reported on the authority of 'A'isha that a woman came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and inquired: Should a woman wash herself when she sees a sexual dream and sees (the marks) of liquid ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Yes. 'A'isha said to her: May your hand be covered with dust and injured. She narrated: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Leave her alone. In what way does the child resemble her but for the fact that when the genes contributed by woman prevail upon those of man, the child resembles the maternal family, and when the genes of man prevail upon those of woman the child resembles the paternal family.
[614]
Thauban, the freed slave of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), said: While I was standing beside the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one of the rabbis of the Jews came and said: Peace be upon you, O Muhammad. I pushed him backwith a push that he was going to fall. Upon this he said: Why do you push me? I said: Why don't you say: O Messenger of Allah? The Jew said: We call him by the name by which he was named by his family. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: My name is Muhammad with which I was named by my family. The Jew said: I have come to ask you (something). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Should that thing be of any benefit to you, if I tell you that ? He (the Jew) said: I will lend my ears to it. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) drew a line with the help of the stick that he had with him and then said: Ask (whatever you like). Thereupon the Jew said: Where would the human beings be on the Daywhen the earth would change into another earth and the heavens too (would change into other heavens) ? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: They would be in darkness beside the Bridge. He (the Jew) again said: Who amongst people would be the first to cross (this bridge).? He said: They would be the poor amongst the refugees. The Jew said: What would constitute their breakfast when they would enter Paradise? He (the Holy Prophet) replied: A caul of the fish-liver. He (the Jew) said. What would be their food alter this ? He (the Holy Prophet) said : A bullockwhich was fed in the different quarters of Paradise would be slaughtered for them. He (the Jew) said: What would be their drink ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: They would be given drink from the fountain which is named "Salsabil". He (the Jew) said: I have come to ask you about a thing which no one amongst the people on the earth knows except an apostle or one or two men besides him. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Would it benefit you if I tell you that? He (the Jew) said: I would lend ears to that. He then said: I have come to ask you about the child. He (the Holy Prophet) said: The reproductive substance of man is white and that of woman (i.e. ovum central portion) yellow, and when they have sexual intercourse and the male's substance (chromosomes and genes) prevails upon the female's substance (chromosomes and genes), it is the male child that is created by Allah's Decree, and when the substance of the female prevails upon the substance contributed by the male, a female child is formed by the Decree of Allah. The Jew said: What you have said is true; verily you are an Apostle. He then returned and went away. The Messenger of Allah(may peace be upon him) said: He asked me about such and such things of which I have had no knowledge till Allah gave me that.
[615]
This tradition has been narrated by Mu'awyia b. Salim with the same chain of transmitters except for the words: I was sitting beside the Messenger of Allah" and some other minor alterations.
[616]
'A'isha reported: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) bathed because of sexual intercourse, he first washed his hands: he then poured water with his right hand on his left hand and washed his private parts. He then performed ablution as is done for prayer'. He then took some water and put his fingers and moved them through the roots of his hair. And when he found that these had been properly mois- tened, then poured three handfuls on his head and then poured water over his body and subsequently washed his feet.
[617]
This hadith is narrated by Abu Kuraib. Ibn Numair and others, all on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters, but in their narration these words are not there: "washed his feet."
[618]
Hisham narrated it from his father, who narrated it on the authority of 'A'isha that when the Apostle (may peace be upon him) took a bath because of sexual inter-course, he first washed the palms of his hands three times, and then the whole hadith was transmitted like that based on the authority of Abu Mu'awyia, but no mention is made of the washing of feet.
[619]
'Urwa has narrated it on the authority of 'A'isha that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took a bath because of sexual intercourse, he first washed his hands before dipping one of them into the basin, and then performed ablu- tion as is done for prayer.
[620]
Ibn 'Abbas reported it on the authority of Maimuna, his mother's sister, that she said: I placed water near the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) to take a bath because of sexual intercourse. He washed the palms of his bands twice or thrice and then put his hand In the basin and poured water over his private parts and washed them with his left hand. He then struck his hand against the earth and rubbed it with force and then performed ablution for the prayer and then poured three handfuls of water on his head and then washed his whole body after which he moved aside from that place and washed his feet, and then I brought a towel (so that he may wipe his body). but he returned it.
[621]
This hadith is narrated by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters, but in the hadith narrated by Yahya b. Yahya and Abu Kuraib there is no mention of: "Pouring of three handfuls of water on the head." and in the hadith narrated by Waki' all the features of ablution have been recorded : rinsing (of mouth), snuffing of water (in the nostrils) ; and in the hadith transmitted by Abu Mu'awyia, there is no mention of a towel.
[622]
Ibn Abbas narrated It on the authority of Maimuna that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was given a towel, but he did not rub (his body) with it, but he did like this with water, i.e. he shook it off.
[623]
'A'isha reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath because of sexual intercourse, he called for a vessel and took a handful of water from it and first (washed) the right side of his head, then left, and then took a handful (of water) and poured it on his head.
[624]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) washed himself with water from a vessel (measuring seven to eight seers) because of sexual intercourse.
[625]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath from the vessel (which contained seven to eight seers, i.e. fifteen to sixteen pounds) of water And I and he (the Holy Prophet) took a bath from the same vessel. And in the hadith narrated by Sufyan the words are: "from one vessel". Qutaiba said : Al-Faraq is three Sa' (a cubic measuring of varying magnitude).
[626]
Abu Salamab. 'Abd al-Rahman reported: I along with the foster brother of 'A'isha went to her and he asked about the bath of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) because of sexual intercourse. She called for a vessel equal to a Sa' and she took a bath. and there was a curtain between us and her. She poured water on her head thrice and he (Abu Salama) said : The wives of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) collectedhair on their heads and these lopped up to ears(and did rot go beyond that).
[627]
Salama b. Abd al-Rahman narrated it on the authority of A'isha that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath, he started from the right hand and poured water over it and washed it, and then poured water on the impurity with the right band and washed it away with the help of the left hand. and after having removed it, he poured water on his head. A'isha said: I and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath from the same vessel, after sexual intercourse.
[628]
Hafsa, daughter of 'Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakr, reported that 'A'isha narrated to her that she and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath from the same vessel which contained water equal to three Mudds or thereabout.
[629]
'A'isha reported: I and the Messenger (may peace be upon him) took a bath from the same vessel and our hands alternated into it in the state that we had had sexual intercourse.
[630]
'A'isha reported : I and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath from one vessel which was placed between me and him and he would get ahead of me, so that I would say : Spare (some water for) me, spare (some water for) me; and she said that they had had sexual intercourse.
[631]
Ibn Abbas said: Maimuna (the wife of the Holy Prophet)reported to me that she and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath from one vessel.
[632]
Ibn Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath with the water left over by Maimuna.
[633]
Zainab bint Umm Salama (the wife of the Holy Prophet) reported that Umm Salama and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath from the same vessel.
[634]
Anas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) took a bath with five Makkuks of water and performed ablution with one Makkuk. Ibn Muthanna has used the words five Makakiyya, and Ibn Mu'adh narrated it from 'Abdullah b. 'Abdullah and he made no mention of Ibn Jabr.
[635]
Anas said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) performed ablution with one Mudd and took bath with a Sa' up to five Mudds.
[636]
Safina reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath with one g' of water because of sexual intercourse and performed ablution with one Mudd.
[637]
Safina reported that Abd Bakr, the Companion of the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him), observed: The Messenger of Allah (may peace.1)e upon him) took a bath with one Sa' of water and performed ablution with one Mudd (of water); and in the hadith narrated by Ibn Hujr the words are: One Mudd sufficed for his (Holy Prophet's) ablution. And Ibn Hujr said that (his Shaikh) Isma'il was much advanced in age, and it was because of this that he could not fully rely on him for this tradition.
[638]
Jubair b. Mut'im reported: The people contended amongst themselves in the presence of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with regard to bathing. Some of them said: We wash our heads like this and this. Upon this the Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: As for me I pour three handfuls of water upon my head.
[639]
Jubair b. Mut'im reported it from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) that a mention was made before him about bathing because of sexual intercourse and he said: I pour water over my head thrice.
[640]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: A delegation of the Thaqif said to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him): Our land is cold; what about our bathing then? He (the Holy Prophet) said: I pour water thrice over my head.
[641]
Ibn Salim in his narration reported : "The delegation of the Thaqif said: Messenger of Allah."
[642]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a bath because of sexual intercourse, he poured three handfuls of water upon his head. Hasan b. Muhammad said to him (the narrator): My hair is thick. Upon this Jabir observed. I said to him: O son of my brother, the hair of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was thicker than your hair and these were more fine (than yours).
[643]
Umm Salama reported: I said: Messenger of Allah, I am a woman who has closely plaited hair on my head; should I undo it for taking a bath, because of sexual intercourse? He (the Holy Prophet) said: No, it is enough for you to throw three handfuls of water on your head and then pour water over yourself, and you shall be purified.
[644]
This hadith has been narrated by Amr al-Naqid, Yazid b. Harun, 'Abd b. Humaid, Abd al-Razzaq, Thauri, Ayyub b. Musa, with the same chain of transmitters. In hadith narrated by Abd al-Razzaq there is a mention of the menstruation and of the sexual intercourse. The rest of the hadith has been transmitted like that of Ibn 'Uyaina.
[645]
This hadith is narrated by the same chain of transmitters by Ahmad al. Darimi, Zakariya b. 'Adi, Yazid, i.e.' Ibn Zurai', Rauh b. al-Qasim, Ayyub b. Musa with the same chain of transmitters, and there is a mention of these words: "Should I undo the plait and wash it, because of sexual intercourse?" and there is no mention of menstruation.
[646]
'Ubaid b. Umair reported: It was conveyed to 'A'isha that 'Abdullah b. 'Amr ordered the women to undo the (plaits) of hair on their heads. She said: How strange it is for Ibn 'Amr that he orders the women to undo the plaits of their head while taking a bath; why does he not order them to shave their beads? I and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took bath from one vessel. I did no more than this that I poured three handfuls of water over my head.
[647]
'A'isha reported: A woman asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) how to wash herself after menstruation. She mentioned that he taught her how to take bath and then told her to take a piece of cotton with musk and purify herself. She said: How should I purify myself with that? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Praise be to Allah, purify yourself with it, and covered his face, Sufyan b. 'Uyaina gave a demonstration by covering his face (as the Holy Prophet had done). 'A'isha reported: I dragged her to my side for I had understood what the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) intended and, therefore, said: Apply this cotton with musk to the trace of blood. Ibn 'Umar in his hadith (has mentioned the words of 'A'isha thus): Apply it to the marks of blood.
[648]
'A'isha reported: A woman asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) how he should wash herself after the menstrual period. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Take a cotton with musk and purity yourself, and the rest of the hadith was narrated like that of Sufyan.
[649]
'A'isha reported: Asma (daughter of Shakal) asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) about washing after menstruation. He said: Everyone amongst you should use water (mixed with the leaves of) the lote-tree and cleanse herself well, and then pour water on her head and rub it vigorously till it reaches the roots of the hair. Then she should pour water on it. Afterwards she should take a piece of cotton smeared with musk and cleanse herself with it. Asma' said: How should she cleanse herself with the help of that? Upon this he (the Apostle of Allah) observed: Praise be to Allah, she should cleanse herself. 'A'isha said in a subdued tone that she should apply it to the trace of blood. She (Asma) then further asked about bathing after sexual intercourse. He (the Holy Prophet) said: She should take water and cleanse herself well or complete the ablution and then (pour water) on her head and rub it till it reaches the roots of the hair (of her) head and then pour water on her. 'A'isha said: How good are the women of Ansar (helpers) that their shyness does not prevent them from learning religion.
[650]
This hadith is narrated by 'Ubaidullah b. Mu'adh with the same chain of transmitters (but for the words) that he (the Holy Prophet) said: Cleanse yourself with it, and he covered (his face on account of shyness).
[651]
'A'isha reported: Asma' b. Shakal came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, how one amongst us should take a bath after the menstruation, and the rest of the hadith is the same and there is no mention of bathing because of sexual intercourse.
[652]
'A'isha reported: Fatimah b. Abu Hubaish came to the Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: I am a woman whose blood keeps flowing (even after the menstruation period). I am never purified ; should I, therefore, abandon prayer? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Not at all, for that is only a vein, and is not a menstruation, so when menstruation comes, abandon prayer, and when it ends wash the blood from yourself and then pray.
[653]
The hadith narrated by Waki' and with its chain of narrators has been transmitted on the authority of Hisham b. 'Urwa, but in the hadith narrated by Qutaiba on the authority of Jarir, the words are: "There came Fatimah b. Abu Hubaish, b. 'Abd al-Muttalib b. Asad, and she was a woman amongst us," and in the hadith of Hammid b. Zaid there is an addition of these words: "We abandoned mentioning him."
[654]
'A'isha reported: Umm Habiba b. Jahsh thus asked for a verdict from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): I am a woman whose blood keeps flowing (after the menstrual period).He (the Holy Prophet) said: That is only a vein, so take a bath and offer prayer; and she took a bath at the time of every prayer. Laith b. Sa'd said: Ibn Shihab made no mention that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had ordered her to take a bath at the time of every prayer, but she did it of her own accord. And in the tradition transmitted by Ibn Rumh there is no mention of Umm Habiba (and there is mention of the daughter of Jahsh only.)
[655]
'A'isha, the wife of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)reported: Umm Habiba b. Jahsh who was the sister-in-law of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and the wife of 'Abd al-Rahman b. Auf, remained mustahada for seven years, and she, therefore, asked for the verdict of Shari'ah from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about it The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: This is not menstruation, but (blood from) a vein: so bathe yourself and offer prayer. 'A'isha said: She took a bath in the wash-tub placed in the apartment of her sister Zainab b. Jahsh, till the redness of the blood came over the water. Ibn Shihab said: I narrated it to Abu Bakr b. 'Abd al-Rahman b. al-Harith b. Hisham about it who observed: May Allah have mercy on Hinda! would that she listened to this verdict. By Lord, she wept for not offering prayer.
[656]
This hadith has been thus reported by another chain of transmitters: Umm Habiba b. Jahsh came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and she had been a mustahada for seven years, and the rest of the hadith was narrated like that of 'Amr b. al-Harith up to the words: "There came the redness of the blood over water." and nothing was narrated beyond it.
[657]
The hadith has been narrated by 'A'isha through another chain of transmitters (in these words): I The daughter of jahsh had been mustabida for seven years," and the rest of the hadith is the same (as mentioned above).
[658]
On the authority of 'A'isha: Umm Habiba asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the blood (which flows beyond the period of menstruation). 'A'isha said: I saw her wash-tub full of blood. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Remain away (from prayer) equal (to the length of time) that your menses prevented you. After this (after the period of usual courses) bathe yourself and offer prayer.
[659]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: Umm Habiba b. Jahsh who was the spouse of Abd al- Rahman b. Auf made a complaint to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about blood (which flows beyond the menstrual period). He said to her: Remain away (from prayer) equal (to the length of time) that your menstruation holds you back. After this, bathe yourself. And she washed herself before every prayer.
[660]
Mu'adha reported: A woman asked 'A'isha: Should one amongst us complete prayers abandoned during the period of menses? 'A'isha said: Are you a Haruriya? When any one of us during the time of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in her menses (and abandoned prayer) she was not required to complete them.
[661]
It is reported from Mu'adha that she asked 'A'isha: Should a menstruating woman complete the prayer (abandoned during the menstrual period) ? 'A'isha said: Are you a Hurariya? The wives of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) have had their monthly courses, (but) did he order them to make compensation (for the abandoned prayers)? Muhammad b. Ja'far said: (Compensation) denotes their completion.
[662]
Mu'adha said: I asked 'A'isha: What is the reason that a menstruating woman completes the fasts (that she abandons during her monthly course). but she does not complete the prayers? She (Hadrat 'A'isha) said: Are you a Haruriya? I said: I am not a Haruriya, but I simply want to inquire. She said: We passed through this (period of menstruation), and we were ordered to complete the fasts, but were not ordered to complete the prayers.
[663]
Umm Hani b. Abu Talib reported: I went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the day of the conquest (of Mecca) and found him take a bath. while his daughter Fatimah was holding a curtain around him.
[664]
Umm Hani b. Abu Talib reported : It was the day of the conquest (of Mecca) that she went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was staying at a higher part (of that city). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up for his bath. Fatimah held a curtain around him (in order to provide him privacy). He then put on his garments and wrapped himself with that and then offered eight rak'ahs of the forenoon prayer.
[665]
This hadith is narrated by Sa'id b. Abu Hind with the same chain of transmitters and said: His (the Holy Prophet's) daughter Fatimah provided him privacy with the help of his cloth, and when he had taken a bath he took it up and wrapped it around him and then stood and offered eight rak'ahs of the forenoon prayer.
[666]
Maimuna reported: I placed water for the Apostle (may peace be upon him) and provided privacy for him, and he took a bath.
[667]
'Abd al-Rahman, the son of Abu Sa'id al-Khudri, reported from his father: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A man should not see the private parts of another man, and a woman should not see the private parts of another woman, and a man should not lie with another man under one covering, and a woman should not lie with another woman under one covering.
[668]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Abu Fudaik and Dabbik b. 'Uthman with the same chain of transmitters and they observed: Private parts of man are the nakedness (which is concealed).
[669]
Amongst the traditions narrated from Muhammad, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the authority of Abu Huraira, the one is that Banu Isra'il used to take a bath naked, and they looked at the private parts of one another. Moses (peace be upon him), however, took a bath alone (in privacy); and they said (tauntingly): By Allah, nothing prohibits Moses to take a bath along with us, but sacrotal hernia. He (Moses) once went for a bath and placed his clothes on a stone and the stone moved on with his clothes. Moses ran after it saying: 0 stone, my clothes, 0 stone, my clothes, and Banu Isra'il had the chance to see the private parts of Moses, and said : By Allah, Moses does not suffer from any ailment. The stone then stopped, till Moses had been seen by them, and he then took hold of his clothes and struck the stone. Abu Huraira said: By Allah, there are the marks of six or seven strokes made by Moses on the stone.
[670]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: When the Ka'ba was constructed the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and Abbas went and lifted stones. Abbas said to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): Place your lower garment on your shoulder (so that you may protect yourself from the roughness and hardness of stones). He (the Holy Prophet) did this, but fell down upon the ground in a state of unconciousness and his eyes were turned towards the sky. He then stood up and said: My lower garment, my lower garment ; and this wrapper was tied around him. In the hadith transmitted by Ibn Rafi', there is the word : "On his neck" and he did not say : "Upon his shoulder."
[671]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was carrying along with them (his people) stones for the Ka'ba and there was a waist wrapper around him. His uncle, "Abbas, said to him: 0 son of my brother! if you take off the lower garment and place it on the shoulders underneath the stones, it would be better. He (the Holy Prophet) took it off and placed it on his shoulder and fell down unconscious. He (the narrator) said: Never was he seen naked after that day.
[672]
Al-Miswar b. Makhrama reported : I was carrying a heavy stone and my lower garment was loose, and it, therefore, slipped off (so soon) that I could not place the stone (on the ground) and carry to its proper place. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Return to your cloth (lower garment), take it (and tie it around your waist) and do not walk naked.
[673]
'Abdullah b. Ja'far reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one day made me mount behind him and he confided to me something secret which I would not disclose to anybody; and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) liked the concealment provided by a lofty place or cluster of dates (while answering the call of nature), Ibn Asma' said in his narration : It implied an enclosure of the date-trees.
[674]
Sa'id al-Khudri narrated it from his father : I went to Quba' with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on Monday till we reached (the habitation) of Banu Salim. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood at the door of 'Itban and called him loudly. So he came out dragging his lower garnment. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : We have made this man to make haste 'Itban said : Messenger of Allah, if a man parts with his wife suddenly without seminal emission, what is he required to do (with regard to bath) ? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : It is with the seminal emission that bath becomes obligatory.
[675]
Abu al.'Ala' b. al-Shikhkhir said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) abrogated some of his commands by others, just as the Qur'an abrogates some part with the other.
[676]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by (the house) of a man amongst the Ansar, and he sent for him. He came out and water was trickling down from his head. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Perhaps we put you to haste. He said : Yes. Messenger of Allah. He (the Holy Prophet) said : When you made haste or semen is not emitted, bathing is not obligatory for you, but ablution is binding. Ibn Bashshir has narrated it with a minor alteration.
[677]
Ubayy Ibn Ka'b reported: I arked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about a man who has sexual intercourse with his wife, but leaves her before orgasm. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: He should wash the secretion of his wife, and then perform ablution and ofier prayer.
[678]
Ubayy ibn Ka'b narrated it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he said : If a person has sexual intercourse with his wife, but does not experience orgasm, he should wash his organ and perform an ablution.
[679]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed: Bathing is obligatory in case of seminal emission.
[680]
Zaid b. Khalid al-Jubani reported that he askad Uthman b. 'Affan: What is your opinion about the man who has sexual intercourse with his wife, but does not experience orgasm? Uthman said: He should perform ablution as he does for prayer, and wash his organ. 'Uthmin also said : I have heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[681]
Abu Ayyub reported that he had heard like this from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[682]
Abu Huraira reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When a man has sexual intercourse, bathing becomes obligatory (both for the male and the female). In the hadith of Matar the words are: Even if there is no orgasm. Zuhair has narrated it with a minor alteration of words.
[683]
This hadith is narrated by Qatida with the same chain of transmitters, but with minor alterations. Here instead of the word -(jahada, (ijtahada) has been used, and the words; "Even if there is no orgasm" have been omitted.
[684]
Abu Musa reported: There cropped up a difference of opinion between a group of Muhajirs (Emigrants and a group of Ansar (Helpers) (and the point of dispute was) that the Ansar said: The bath (because of sexual intercourse) becomes obligatory only-when the semen spurts out or ejaculates. But the Muhajirs said: When a man has sexual intercourse (with the woman), a bath becomes obligatory (no matter whether or not there is seminal emission or ejaculation). Abu Musa said: Well, I satisfy you on this (issue). He (Abu Musa, the narrator) said: I got up (and went) to 'A'isha and sought her permission and it was granted, and I said to her: 0 Mother, or Mother of the Faithful, I want to ask you about a matter on which I feel shy. She said : Don't feel shy of asking me about a thing which you can ask your mother, who gave you birth, for I am too your mother. Upon this I said: What makes a bath obligatory for a person ? She replied: You have come across one well informed! The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When anyone sits amidst four parts (of the woman) and the circumcised parts touch each other a bath becomes obligatory.
[685]
'A'isha the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) reported. A person asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about one who has sexual intercourse with his wife and parts away (without orgasm) whether bathing is obligatory for him. 'A'isha was sitting by him. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I and she (the Mother of the Faithful) do it and then take a bath.
[686]
Zaid b Thabit reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say this: Ablution is obligatory (for one who takes anything) touched by fire.
[687]
'Abdullah b. Ibrahim b. Qariz reported that he found Abu Huraira performing ablution in the mosque, who said: I am performing ablution because of having eaten pieces of cheese, for I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Perform ablution (after eating anything) touched by fire.
[688]
'Urwa reported on the authority of'A'isha, the wife of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), saying this: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said. Perform ablution (after eating) anything touched by fire.
[689]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took (meat of) goat's shoulder and offered prayer and did not perform ablution.
[690]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took flesh from the bone or meat, and then offered prayer and did not perform ablution, and (in fact) he did not touch water.
[691]
Ja'far b. Amr b. Umayya al-Damari reported on the authority of his father who said: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) take slices from goat's shoulder, and then eat them, and then offer prayer without having performed ablution.
[692]
Ja'far b. 'Amr b. Umayya al-Damari reported on the authority of his father who said: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) take slices from goat's shoulder and then eat them. He was called for prayer and he got'up, leaving aside the knife, and offered prayer but did not perform ablution.
[693]
Ibn 'Abbas reported it on the authority of Maimuana, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) took (a piece of goat's) shoulder at her place, and then offered prayer but did not perform ablution.
[694]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn 'Abbas on the authority of Maimuna. the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him), by another chain of transmitters.
[695]
Abu Rafi' reported: I testify that I used to roast the liver of the goat for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be tipcn him) and then he offered praver but did not perform ablution.
[696]
Ibn Abbas reported: The Apostle (may peace be upon him) took milk and then called for water and rinsed (his mouth) and said: It contains greasiness.
[697]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters.
[698]
Ibn Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) dressed himself, and then went out for prayer, when he was presented with bread and meat. He took three morsels out of that, and then offered prayer along with other people and did not touch water.
[699]
This hadith is narrated by Muhammad b. 'Amr b. Ata' with these words: I was with Ibn 'Abbas, and Ibn 'Abbas saw the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) doing like this, and it is also said that the words are: He (the Holy Prophet) offered prayer; and the word "people" is not mentioned.
[700]
Jabir b. Samura reported: A man asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) whether he should perform ablution after (eating) mutton. He (the Messenger of Allah) said: Perform ablution it you so desire, and if you do not wish, do not perform it. He (again) asked: Should I perform ablution (after eating) camel's flesh? He said: Yes, perform ablution (after eating) camel's flesh. He (again) said: May I say prayer in the sheepfolds? He (the Messenger of Allah) said: Yes. He (the narrator) again said: May I say prayer where camels lie down? He (the Holy Prophet) said: No.
[701]
This hadith is also narrated by another chain of transmitters.
[702]
'Abbad b. Tamim reported from his uncle that a person made a complaint to the Apostle (may peace be upon him) that he entertained (doubt) as it something had happened to him breaking his ablution. He (the Holy Prophet) said: He should not return (from prayer) unless he hears a sound or perceives a smell (of passing wind). Abu Bakr and Zuhair b. Harb have pointed out in their narrations that it was 'Abdullah b. Zaid.
[703]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If any one of you has pain in his abdomen, but is doubtful whether or not anything has issued from him, be should not leave the mosque unless he hears a sound or perceives a smell.
[704]
The freed slave-girl of Maimuna was given a goat in charity but it died. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by that (carcass). Upon this be said : Why did you not take off its skin? You could put it to use, after tanning it. They (the Companions) said: It was dead. Upon, this he (the Messenger of Allah) said: Only its eating is prohibited. Abu bakr and Ibn Umar in their narrations said: It is narrated from Maimuna (may Allah be pleased with her).
[705]
Ibn 'Abbas said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw a dead goat, which had been given in charity to the freed slave-girl of Maimuna. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Why don't you make use of its skin? They (the Companions around the Holy Prophet) said: It is dead. Upon this he said: It is the eating (of the dead animal) which is prohibited.
[706]
This hadith is narrated by Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters as transmitted by Yunus.
[707]
Ibn Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by a goat thrown (away) which had been in fact given to the freed slave-girl of Maimuna as charity. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (way peace he upon him) said: Why did they not get its skin ? They had better tan it and make use of it.
[708]
Ibn'Abbas reported on the authority of Maimuna that someone amongst the wives of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had a domestic animal and it died. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Why did you not take off its skin and make use of that?
[709]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Apostle of Allah(may peace be upon him)happened to pass by (the dead body) of the goat which belonged to the freed slave-girl of Maimuna and said: Why did you not make use of its skin?
[710]
Abdullah b. Abbas said: I heard the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: When the skin is tanned it becomes purified.
[711]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas by another chain of transmitters.
[712]
Abu al-Khair reported: I saw Ibn Wa'la al-Saba'i wear a fur. I touched it. He said: Why do you touch it ? I asked Ibn 'Abbas saying: We are the inhabitants of the western regions, and there (live) with us Berbers and Magians. They bring with them rams and slaughter them, but we do not eat (the meat of the animals) slaughtered by them, and they come with skins full of fat. Upon this Ibn 'Abbas said: We asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about this and he said: Its tanning makes it pure.
[713]
Ibn Wa'la al-Saba'i reported: I asked 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas saying: We are the inhabitants of the western regions. The Magians come to us with skins full of water and fat. He said : Drink. I said to him: Is it your own opinion ? Ibn Abbas said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Tanning purifies it (the skin).
[714]
'A'isha reported: We went with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on one of his journeys and when we reached the place Baida' or Dhat al-jaish, my necklace was broken (and fell somewhere). The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) along with other people stayed there for searching it. There was neither any water at that place nor was there any water with them (the Companions of the Holy Prophet). Some persons came to my father Abu Bakr and said: Do you see what 'A'isha has done? She has detained the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and persons accompanying him, and there is neither any water here or with them. So Abu Bakr came there and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was sleeping with his head on my thigh. He (Abu Bakr) said: You have detained the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and other persons and there is neither water here nor with them. She ('A'isha) said : Abu Bakr scolded me and uttered what Allah wanted him to utter and nudged my hips with his hand. And there was nothing to prevent me from stirring but for the fact that the messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was lying upon my thigh. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) slept till it was dawn at a waterless place. So Allah revealed the verses pertaining to tayammum and they (the Holy Prophet and his Companions) performed tayammum. Usaid b. al-Hudair who was one of the leaders said: This is not the first of your blessings, 0 Family to Abu Bakr. 'A'isha said: We made the came) stand which was my mount and found the necklace under it.
[715]
'A'isha reported she had borrowed from Asma' (her sister) a necklace and it was lost. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent men to search for it. As it was the time for prayer, they offered prayer without ablution (as water was not available there). When they came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), they made a complaint about it, and the verses pertaining to tayammum were revealed. Upon this Usaid b. Hadair said (to 'A'isha): May Allah grant you a good reward! Never has been there an occasion when you were beset with difficulty and Allah did not make you come out of that and made it an occasion of blessing for the Muslims.
[716]
Shaqiq reported : I was sitting in the company of Abdullah and Abu Musa when Abu Musa said: 0 'Abd al-Rahman (kunya of 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud), what would you like a man to do about the prayer if he experiences a seminal emission or has sexual intercourse but does not find water for a month ?'Abdullah said: He should not perform tayammum even if he does not find water for a month. 'Abdullah said: Then what about the verse in Sura Ma'ida: "If you do not find water, betake yourself to clean dust" ? 'Abdullah said : If they were granted concession on the basis of this verse, there is a possibility that they would perform tayammum with dust on finding water very cold for themselves. Abu Musa said to Abdullah: You have not heard the words of 'Ammar: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent me on an errand and I had a seminal emission, but could find no water, and rolled myself in dust just as a beast rolls itself. I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then and made a mention of that to him and he (the Holy Prophet)said: It would have been enough for you to do thus. Then he struck the ground with his hands once and wiped his right hand with the help of his left hand and the exterior of his palms and his face. 'Abdullah said: Didn't you see that Umar was not fully satisfied with the words of 'Ammar only ?
[717]
This hadith is narrated by Shaqiq with the same chain of transmitters but with the alteration of these words: He (the Holy Prophet) struck hands upon the earth, and then shook them and then wiped his face and palm.
[718]
Abd al-Rabmin b. Abza narrated It on the authority of his father that a man came to 'Umar and said: I am (at times) affected by seminal emission but find no water. He ('Umar) told him not to say prayer. 'Ammar then said. Do you remember, 0 Commander of the Faithful, when I and you were in a military detachment and we had had a seminal emission and did not find water (for taking bath) and you did not say prayer, but as for myself I rolled in dust and said prayer, and (when it was mentioned before) the Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: It was enough for you to strike the ground with your hands and then blow (the dust) and then wipe your face and palms. Umar said: 'Ammar, fear Allah. He said: If you so like, I would not narrate it.
A hadith like this has been transmitted with the same chain of transmitters but for the words: 'Umar said: We hold you responsible for what you claim."
[719]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Abza mnated it on the authority of his father that a man came to Umar and said : I have had a seminal emission but I found no water, and the rest of the hadith is the same but with this addition: 'Amr said: 0 Commander of the Faithful, because of the right given to you by Allah over me, if you desire, I would not narrate this hadith to anyone.
[720]
Umair, the freed slave of Ibn 'Abbas, reported: I and 'Abd al-Rahmin b. Yasir, the freed slave of Maimuna, the wife of the Apostle (way peace be upon him). came to the house of Abu'l-Jahm b. al-Harith al-Simma Ansari and he said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came from the direction of Bi'r Jamal and a man met him; he saluted him but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made no response, till he (the Holy Prophet) came to the wall, wiped his face and hands and then returned his salutations.
[721]
Ibn Umar reported: A person happened to pass by the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) when he was making water and saluted him, but he did not respond to his salutation.
[722]
Abu Huraira reported that he met the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him)on one of the paths leading to Medina in a state of (sexual) defilement and he slipped away and took a bath. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) searched for him and when he came, he said to him: 0 Abu Huraira, where were you? He said: Messenger of Allah, you met when I was (sexually) defiled and I did not like to sit in your company before taking a bath. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Hallowed be Allah, verily a believer is never defiled.
[723]
Hudhaifa reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to meet him and he was (sexually) defiled, and he slipped away and took a bath and then came and said: I was (sexually) defiled. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) remarked: A Muslim is never defiled.
[724]
'A'isha said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to remember Allah at all moments.
[725]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out of the privy, and he was presented with some food, and the people reminded him about ablution, but he said: Am I to say prayer that I should perform ablution ?
[726]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: We were with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he had come out of the privy. Food was presented to him. It was said to him (by the Companions around him) : Wouldn't you perform ablution? Upon this he said: Why, am I to say prayer that I should perform ablution ?
[727]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went to the privy and when he came back, he was presented with food. It was said to him; Messenger of Allah, wouldn't you perform ablution. He said : Why, am I to say prayer?
[728]
Ibn Abbas, reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out of the privy after relieving himself, and food was brought to him and he took it, and did not touch water. In another narration transmitted by Sa'id b. al-Huwairith it is like this: It was said to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) You have not performed ablution. He said: I do not intend to say prayer that I should perform ablution.
[729]
Anas reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered the privy, and in the hadith transmitted by Hushaim (the words are): When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered the lavatory, be used to say: O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from wicked and noxious things.
[730]
This hadith is also transmitted by 'Abd al-'Aziz with the same chain of transmitters, and the words are: I seek refuge with Allah from the wicked and noxious things.
[731]
Anas reported: (The people) stood up for prayer and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was whispering to a man, and in the narration of 'Abd al-Warith (the words are): The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was having a private conversation with a man, and did not start the prayer till the people dozed off.
[732]
Anas b. Malik reported: (The people) stood up for prayer and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was talking in whispers with a man, and he did not discontinue the conversation till his Companions dozed off; he then came and led the prayer.
[733]
Qatida reported: I heard Anas as saying that the Companion of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) dozed off and then offered prayer and did not perform ablution. He (the narrator) said: I asked him if he had actually heard it from Anas. He said: By Allah. yes.
[734]
Anas reported: (The people) stood up for the night prayer when a man spoke forth: I need to say something. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered into secret conversation with him, till the people dozed off or some of the people (dozed off), and then they said the prayer.
[735]
Ibn Umar reported: When the Muslims came to Medina, they gathered and sought to know the time of prayer but no one summoned them.One day they discussed the matter, and some of them said: Use something like the bell of the Christians and some of them said: Use horn like that of the Jews.Umar said: Why may not a be appointed who should call (people) to prayer?The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: O Bilal, get up and summon (the people) to prayer.
[736]
Anas reported: Bilal was commanded (by the Apostle of Allah) to repeat (the phrases of) Adhan twice and once in Iqama. The narrator said: I made a men- tion of it before Ayyub who said : Except for saying: Qamat-1s-Salat [the time for prayer has come].
[737]
Anas b. Malik reported: They (the Companions) discussed that they should know the timings of prayer by means of something recognized by all.Some of them said that fire should be lighted or a bell should be rung.But Bilal was ordered to repeat the phrases twice in Adhan, and once in Iqama.
[738]
This hadith is transmitted by Khalid Hadhdha with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): When the majority of the people discussed they should know, like the hadith narrated by al-Thaqafi (mentioned above) except for the words: "They (the people) should kindle fire."
[739]
Anas reported: Bilal was commanded (by the Holy Prophet) to repeat the phrases twice in Adhan, and once in lqama.
[740]
Abu Mahdhura said that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) taught him Adhan like this: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest; I testify that there is no god but Allah, I testify that there is no god but Allah ; I testify that Muhammad Is the Messenger of Allah, I testify that Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah, and it should be again repeated : I testify that there is no god but Allah, I testify that there is no god but Allah; I testify that Muhammad Is the Messenger of Allah, I testify that Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah.Come to the prayer (twice).Come to the prayer (twice).Ishaq added: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest ; there Is no god but Allah.
[741]
Ibn Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had two Mu'adhdhins, Bilal and 'Abdullah b. Umm Maktum, who (latter) was blind.
[742]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha by another chain of transmitters.
[743]
A'isha reported: Ibn Umm Maktum used to pronounce Adhan at the behest of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (despite the fact) that he was blind.
[744]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Hisham.
[745]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to attack the enemy when it was dawn. He would listen to the Adhan ; so if he heard an Adhan, he stopped, otherwise made an attack.Once on hearing a man say: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) remarked: He is following al-Fitra (al-Islam).Then hearing him say: I testify that there is no god but Allah. there is no god but Allah, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: You have come out of the Fire (of Hell).They looked at him and found that he was a goatherd.
[746]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: When you hear the call (to prayer), repeat what the Mu'adhdhin pronounces.
[747]
'Abdullah b. Amr b. al-As reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : When you hear the Mu'adhdhin, repeat what he says, then invoke a blessing on me, for everyone who invokes a blessing on me will receive ten blessings from Allah; then beg from Allah al-Wasila for me, which is a rank in Paradise fitting for only one of Allah's servants, and I hope that I may be that one.If anyone who asks that I be given the Wasila, he will be assured of my intercession.
[748]
'Umar b. al-Khattab reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the Mu'adhdhin says: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest, and one of you should make this response: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest; (and when the Mu'adhdhin) says: I testify that there is no god but Allah, one should respond: I testify that there is no god but Allah, and when he says: I testify that Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah, one should make a response: I testify that Muhammad is Allah's Messenger.When he (the Mu'adhdhin) says: Come to prayer, one should make a response: There is no might and no power except with Allah.When he (the Mu'adhdhin) says: Come to salvation, one should respond: There is no might and no power except with Allah, and when he (the Mu'adhdhin) says: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest, then make a response: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest. When he (the Mu'adhdhin) says: There is no god but Allah, and he who makes a re- sponse from the heart: There is no god but Allah, he will enter Paradise.
[749]
Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If anyone says on hearing the Mu'adhdhin : I testify that there is no god but Allah alone.Who has no partner, and that Muhammad is His servant and His Messenger, (and that) I am satisfied with Allah as my Lord, with Muhammad as Messenger. and with Islam as din (code of life), his sins would be forgiven.In the narration transmitted by Ibn Rumh the words are: "He who said on hearing the Mu'adhdhin and verity I testify."' Qutaiba has not mentioned his words: "And I."
[750]
Yahya narrated it on the authority of his uncle that he had been sitting in the company of Mu'awiya b. Abu Sufyan when the Mu'adhdhin called (Muslims) to prayer. Mu'awiya said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying The Mu'adhdhins will have the longest necks on the Day of Resurrection.
[751]
Abu Sufyan reported it on the authority of Jabir that he had heard the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) say : When Satan hears the call to prayer, he runs away to a distance like that of Rauha.Sulaimin said: I asked him about Rauha.He replied : It is at a distance of thirty-six miles from Medina.
[752]
Abu Mu'awiya narrated it on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[753]
AbuHuraira reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: When Satan hears the call to prayer, he turns back and breaks the wind so as not to bear the call being made, but when the call is finished he turns round and distracts (the minds of those who pray), and when he bears the Iqama he again runs away so as not to hear its voice and when it subsides, he comes back and distracts (the minds of those who stand for prayer).
[754]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the Mu'adhdhin calls to prayer, Satan runs back vehemently.
[755]
Suhail reported that his father sent him to Banu Haritha along with a boy or a man. Someone called him by his name from an enclosure. He (thenarrator) said: The person with me looked towards the enclosure, but saw nothing. I made a mention of that to my father.He said: If I knew that you would meet such a situation I would have never sent you (there), but (bear in wind) whenever you hear such a call (from the evil spirits) pronounce the Adhan. for I have heard Abu Huraira say that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upbn him) said: Whenever Adhan is proclaimed, Satan runs back vehemently.
[756]
Abu Huraira reported: The Apostle (may peace be upon him) said When the call to prayer is made, Satan runs back and breaks wind so as not to hear the call being made, and when the call is finished. he turns round.When Iqama is proclaimed he turns his back, and when it is finished he turns round to distract a man, saying: Re- member such and such; remember such and such, referring to something the man did not have in his mind, with the result that he does not know how much he has prayed.
[757]
A hadith like it has been narrated by Abu Huraira but for these words : "He (the man saying the prayer) does not know how much he has prayed.
[758]
Salim narrated it on the authority of his father who reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) raising his hands apposite the shoulders at the time of beginning the prayer and before bowing down and after coming back to the position after bowing. but he did not raise them between two prostrations.
[759]
Ibn Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), when he stood up for prayer, used to raise his hands apposite the shoulders and then recited takbir (Allah-o-Akbar), and when he was about to bow he again did like it and when he raised himself from the ruku' (bowing posture) he again did like it, but he did not do it at the time of raising his head from prostration.
[760]
This hadith has been transmitted with the same chain of transmitters by al. Zuhri as narrated by Ibn Juraij (who) said . When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up for prayer, he raised hands (to the height) apposite the shoulders and then recited takbir.
[761]
Abu Qilaba reported that he saw Malik b. Huwairith raising his hands at the beginning of prayer and raising his hands before kneeling down, and raising his hands after lifting his head from the state of kneeling, and he narrated that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to do like this.
[762]
Malik b. Huwairith reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) raised his hands apposite his ears at the time of reciting the takbir (i.e. at the time of beginning the prayer) and then again raised his hands apposite the ears at the time of bowing and when he lifted his head after bowing he said: Allah listened to him who praised Him, and did like it (raised his hands up to the ears).
[763]
This hadith has been transmitted by Qatada with the same chain of trans. mitters that he saw the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) doing like this (i.e. raising his hands) till they were apposite the lobes of cars.
[764]
Abu Salama reported: Abu Huraira led prayer for them and recited takbir when he bent and raised himself (in ruku' and sujud) and after completing (the prayer) he said: By Allah I say prayer which has the best resemblance with the prayer of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) amongst you.
[765]
Abu Huraira reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up for prayer, he would say the takbir (Allah-o-Akbar) when standing, then say the takbir when bowing. then say: "Allah listened to him who praised him," when coming to the erect position after bowing, then say while standing: "To Thee, our Lord, be the praise", then recite the takbir when getting down for prostration, then say the takbir on raising his head, then say the takbir on prostrating himself, then say the takbir on raising his head.He would do that throughout the whole prayer till he would complete it, and he would say the takbir when he would get up at the end of two rak'as after adopting the sitting posture.Abu Huraira said: My prayer has the best resemblance amongst you with the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[766]
Ibn al-Harith reported: He had heard Abu Huraira say: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited takbir on standing for prayer, and the rest of the hadith is like that transmitted by Ibn Juraij (recorded above), but he did not mention Abu Huraira as saying: "My prayer has the best resemblance amongst you with the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[767]
Abu Salama b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported.. When Marwan appointed Abu Huraira as his deputy in Medina, he recited takbir whenever he got up for obligatory prayer, and the rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by Ibn Juraij (but with the addition of these words): On completing the prayer with salutation, and he turned to the people in the mosque and said....
[768]
Abu Salama reported that Abu Huraira recited takbir in prayer on all occasions of rising and kneeling.We said: O Abu Huraira, what is this takbir?He said: Verily it is the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[769]
Suhail reported on the authority of his father that Abu Huraira used to recite takbir on all occasions of rising and bending (in prayer) and narrated that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to do like that.
[770]
Mutarrif reported: I and 'Imran b. Husain said prayer behind 'Ali b. Abu, Talib.He recited takbir when he prostrated, and he recited takbir when he raised his head and he recited takbir while rising up (from the sitting position at the end of two rak'ahs).When we had finished our prayer, 'Imran caught hold of my hand and said: He (Hadrat Ali) has led prayer like Muhammad (may peace be upon him) or he said: He in fact recalled to my mind the prayer of Muhammad (may peace be upon him.)
[771]
'Ubada b. as-Samit reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him ): He who does not recite Fatihat al-Kitab is not credited with having observed the prayer.
[772]
Ubada b. as-Samit reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who does not recite Umm al-Qur'an is not credited with having observed the prayer.
[773]
Mahmud b. al-Rabi', on whose face the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) squirted water from the well, reported on the authority of 'Ubada b. as- Samit that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : He who does not recite Umm al-Qur'an is not credited with having observed prayer.
[774]
This hadith has also been transmitted by Ma'mar from al-Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters with the addition of these words : "and something more".
[775]
Abu Huraira reported : The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If anyone observes prayer in which he does not recite Umm al-Qur'an, It is deficient [he said this three times] and not complete.It was said to Abu Huraira: At times we are behind the Imam.He said: Recite it inwardly, for he had heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) declare that Allah the Exalted had said : I have divided the prayer into two halves between Me and My servant, and My servant will receive what he asks.When the servant says: Praise be to Allah, the Lord of the universe, Allah the Most High says: My servant has praised Me.And when he (the servant) says: The Most Compassionate, the Merciful, Allah the Most High says: My servant has lauded Me.And when he (the servant) says: Master of the Day of judg- ment, He remarks: My servant has glorified Me. and sometimes He would say: My servant entrusted (his affairs) to Me.And when he (the worshipper) says: Thee do we worship and of Thee do we ask help, He (Allah) says: This is between Me and My servant, and My servant will receive what he asks for.Then, when he (the worshipper) says: Guide us to the straight path, the path of those to whom Thou hast been Gracious not of those who have incurred Thy displeasure, nor of those who have gone astray, He (Allah) says: This is for My servant, and My servant will receive what he asks for.Sufyan said: 'Ala b. 'Abd al-Rahman b. Ya'qub narrated it to me when I went to him and he was confined to his home on account of illness, and I asked him about it.
[776]
It is naratted on the authority of Abu Huraira that he had heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: He who observed prayer but he did not recite the Umm al-Qur'an in it, and the rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by Sufyan, and in this hadith the words are: "Allah the Most High said: the prayer is divided into two halves between Me and My servant. The half of it is for Me and the half of it is for My servant."
[777]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : He who said his prayer, but did not recite the opening chapter of al-Kitab, his prayer is incomplete.He repeated it thrice.
[778]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : One is not credited with having observed the prayer without the recitation (of al-Fatiha).So said Abu Huraira: (The prayer in which) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited in a loud voice, we also recited that loudly for you (and the prayer in which) he recited inwardly we also recited inwardly for you (to give you a practical example of the prayer of the Holy Prophet).
[779]
'Ata' narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira who said that one should recite (al-Fatiha) in every (rak'ah of) prayer.What we heard (i.e. recitation) from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), we made you listen to that.And that which he (recited) inwardly, we (recited) inwardly for you.A person said to him: If I add nothing to the (recitation) of the Umm al Qur'an (Surat al-Fatiha), would it make the prayer incomplete?He (AbuHuraira) said: If you add to that (if you recite some of verses of the Qur'an along with Surat at-Fatiha) that is better for you.But if you are contented with it (Surat al-Fatiha) only, it is sufficient for you.
[780]
'Ata' reported it on the authority of Abu Huraira who said: Recitation (of Surat al-Fatiha) in every (rak'ah) of prayer in essential. (The recitation) that we listened to from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) we made you listen to it. And that which he recited inwardly to us, we recited it inwardly for you.And he who recites Umm al-Qur'an, it is enough for him (to complete the prayer), and he who adds to it (recites some other verses of the Holy Qur'an along with Surat al-Fatiha), it is preferable for him.
[781]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered the mosque and a person also entered therein and offered prayer, and then came and paid salutation to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).The Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) returned his salutation and said:Go back and pray, for you have not offered the prayer.He again prayed as he had prayed before, and came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon. him) and saluted him.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) returned the salutation and said: Go back and say prayer, for you have not offered the prayer.This (act of repeating the prayer) was done three times.Upon this the person said : By Him Who hast sent you with Truth, whatever better I can do than this, please teach me.He (the Holy Prophet) said: When you get up to pray, recite takbir, and then recite whatever you conveniently can from the Qur'an, then bow down and remain quietly in that position, then raise your- self and stand erect ; then prostrate yourself and remain quietly in that attitude; then raise yourself and sit quietly ; and do that throughout all your prayers.
[782]
Abu Huraira reported: A person entered the mosque and said prayer while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was sitting in a nook (of the mosque), and the rest of the hadith is the same as mentioned above, but with this addition: "When you get up to pray, perform the ablution completely, and then turn towards the Qibla and recite takbir (Allah o Akbar - Allah is the Most Great)."
[783]
lmrin b. Husain reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace beupon him) led us In Zuhr or 'Asr prayer (noon or the afternoon prayer). (On concluding it) he said: Who recited behind me (the verses): Sabbih Isma Rabbik al-a'la (Glorify the name of thy Lord, the Most High)?There upon a person said: It was I, but I in- tended nothing but goodness.I felt that some one of you was disputing with me in it (or he was taking out from my tongue what I was reciting), said the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him).
[784]
'Imran b. Husain reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed the Zuhr prayer and a person recited Sabbih Isma Rabbik al-a'la (Glorify the name of thy Lord, the Most High) behind him.When he (the Holy Pro- phet) concluded the prayer he said: Who amongst you recited (the above-mentioned verse) or who amongst you was the reciter?A person said: It was I. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) observed: I thought as if someone amongst you was disputing with me (in what I was reciting).
[785]
This hadith has been narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Zuhr prayer and said: I felt that someone amongst you was disputing with me (in what I was reciting).
[786]
Anas reported: I observed prayer along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and with Abu Bakr, Umar and Uthman (may Allah be pleased with all of them), but I never heard any one of them reciting Bismillah-ir-Rahman-ir-Rahim loudly.
[787]
Shu'ba reported it with the same chain of transmitters. with she addition of these words: "I said to Qatada: Did you hear it from Anas?He replied in the affir- mative and added: We had inquired of him about it."
[788]
'Abda reported: 'Umar b. al-Khattab used to recite loudly these words: Subhanak Allahumma wa bi hamdika wa tabarakasmuka wa ta'ala jadduka wa la ilaha ghairuka [Glory to Thee, 0 Allah, and Thine is the Praise, and Blessed is Thy Name. and Exalted is Thy Majesty. and there is no other object of worship beside Thee]. Qatada informed in writing that Anas b. Malik had narrated to him: I observed prayer behind the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and Abu Bakr and Umar and 'Uthman.They started (loud recitation) with: AI-hamdu lillahi Rabb al-'A1amin [All Praise is due to Allah, the Lord of the worlds] and did not recite Bismillah ir- Rahman-ir-Rahim (loudly) at the beginning of the recitation or at the end of it.
[789]
It is reported on the authority of Abu Talha that he had heard Anas b. Malik narrating this.
[790]
Anas reported: One day the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was sitting amongst us that he dozed off.He then raised his head smilingly.We said: What makes you smile.Messenger of Allah?He said: A Sura has just been revealed to me, and then recited: In the name of Allah, the Compassionate, the Merciful.Verily We have given thee Kauthar (fount of abundance).Therefore turn to thy Lord for prayer and offer sacrifice, and surely thy enemy is cut off (from the good). Then he (the Holy Prophet) said : Do you know what Kauthar is?We said: Allah and His Messenger know best. The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said : It (Kauthar) is a canal which my Lord, the Exalted and Glorious has promised me, and there is an abundance of good in it.It is a cistern and my people would come to it on the Day of Resurrection, and tumblers there would be equal to the number of stars.A servant would be turned away from (among the people gathered there).Upon this I would say: My Lord, he is one of my people, and He (the Lord) would say: You do not know that he innovated new things (in Islam) after you.Ibn Hujr made this addition in the hadith : "He (the Holy Prophet) was sitting amongst us in the mosque, and He (Allah) said : (You don't know) what he innovated after you"
[791]
Mukhtar b. Fulful reported that he had heard Anas b. Malik say that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) dozed off, and the rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by Mus-hir except for the words that he (the Holy Prophet) said: It (Kauthar) is a canal which my Lord the Exalted and the Glorious has promised me in Paradise.There is a tank over it, but he made no mention of the tumblers like the number of the stars.
[792]
Wa'il b. Hujr reported : He saw the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) raising his hands at the time of beginning the prayer and reciting takbir, and according to Hammam (the narrator), the hands were lifted opposite to ears.He (the Holy Prophet) then wrapped his hands in his cloth and placed his right hand over his left hand.And when he was about to bow down, he brought out his hands from the cloth, and then lifted them, and then recited takbir and bowed down, and when (he came back to the erect position) he recited: "Allah listened to him who praised Him." And when prostrates. he prostrated between the two palms.
[793]
'Abdullah (b.Mas'ud) said: While observing prayer behind the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) we used to recite: Peace be upon Allah, peace be upon so and so.One day the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to us: Verily Allah is Himself Peace.When any one of you sits during the prayer. he should say: All services rendered by words, by acts of worship, and all good things are due to Allah.Peace be upon you, 0 Prophet, and Allah's mercy and blessings.Peace be upon us and upon Allah's upright servants, for when he says this it reaches every upright servant in heaven and earth (and say further): I testify that there is no god but Allah and I testify that Muhammad is His servant and Messenger.Then he may choose any supplication which pleases him and offer it.
[794]
Shu'ba has narrated this on the authority of Mansur with the same chain of transmitters, but he made no mention of this: "Then he may choose any supplication which pleases him."
[795]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mansur with the same chain of transmitters and he made a mention of this: "Then he may choose any supplication which pleases him or which he likes."
[796]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported: We were sitting with the Apostle (may peace be upon him) in prayer, and the rest of the hadith is the same as narrated by Mansur He (also said) : After (reciting tashahud) he may choose any prayer.
[797]
Ibn Mas'ud is reported to have said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) taught me tashahhud taking my hand within his palms, in the same way as he taught me a Sura of the Qur'an, and he narrated it as narrated above.
[798]
Ibn 'Abbas reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to teach us tashahbud just as he used to teach us a Sura of the Qur'an, and he would say: All services rendered by.,words, acts of worship. and all good thirgs are due to Allah.Peace be upon you, 0 Prophet. and Allah's mercy and blessings.Peace be upon us and upon Allah's upright servants.I testify that there is no god but Allah, and I testify that Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah.In the narration of Ibn Rumb (the words are): "As he would teach us the Qur'an."
[799]
Tawus narrated it on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas that he said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to teach us tashahhud as he would teach us a Sura of the Qur'an.
[800]
Hattan b. 'Abdullah al-Raqiishi reported: I observed prayer with Abu Musu al-Ash'ari and when he was in the qa'dah, one among the people said: The prayer has been made obligatory along with piety and Zakat.He (the narrator) said: When Abu Musa had finished the prayer after salutation he tuined (towards the people) and said : Who amongst you said such and such a thing ? A hush fell on the people.He again said.. Who amongst you has said such and such a thing ? A hush fell on the people.He (Abu Musa) said : Hattan, It is perhaps you that have uttered it.He (Hattan) said No. I have not uttered it.I was afraid that you might be annoyed with me on account of this.A person amongst the people said: It was I who said it, and In this I intended nothing but good.Abu Musa said: Don't you know what you have to recite in your prayers?Verily the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) addressed us and explained to us all Its aspects and taught us how to observe prayer (properly).He (the Holy Prophet) said: When you pray make your rows straight and let anyone amongst you act as your Imim.Recite the takbir when he recites it and when be recites : Not of those with whom Thou art angry. nor of those who go astray, say: Amin.Allah would respond you.And when he (the Imim) recites the takbir, you may also recite the takbir, for the Imam bows before you and raises himself before you.Then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : The one is equivalent to the other.And when he says: Allah listens to him who praises Him, you should say: 0 Allah, our.Lord, to Thee be the praise, for Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, has vouchsafed (us) through the tongue of His Apostle (may peace be upon him) that Allah listens to him who praises Him.And when he (the Imim) recites the takbir and prostrates, you should also recite the takbir and prostrate, for the Imim prostrates before you and raises himself before you.The Messenger' of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The one is equi- valent to the other.And when he (the Imim) sits for Qa'da (for tashahhud) the first words of every one amongst you should be: All services rendered by words, acts of worship and all good things are due to Allah.Peace be upon you, 0 Apostle, and Allah's mercy and blessings.Peace be upon us and upon the upright servants of Allah. I testify that there is no god but Allah, and I testify that Mubammad is His servant and His Messenger.
[801]
Qatida has narrated a badith like this with another chain of transmitters. In the badith transmitted by Jarir on the authority of Sulaiman, Qatida's further words are: When (the Qur'in) is recited (in prayer), you should observe silence, and (the following words are) not found in the hadith narrated by anyone except by Abu Kamil who heard it from Abu 'Awina (and the words are): Verily Allah vouchsafed through the tongue of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) this: Allah listens to him who praises Him.Abu Ishaq (a student of Imam Muslim) said: Abu Bakr the son of Abu Nadr's sister has (critically) discussed this hadith.Imam Muslim said: Whom can you find a more authentic transmitter of badith than Sulaiman ? Abu Bakr said to him (Imam Muslim) : What about the hadith narrated by Abd Huraira, i.e. the hadith that when the Qur'in is recited (in pray er) observe silence? He (Abu Bakr again) said: Then, why.have you not included it (in your compilation) ? He (Imam Muslim) said: I have not included in this every hadith which I deem authentic; I have recorded only such ahadith on which there is an agreement (amongst the Muhaddithin apart from their being authentic).
[802]
This hadith has been transmitted by Qatida with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are) : "Allah, the Exalted and the Glorious, commanded it through the tongue of His Apostle (may peace be upon-him) : Allah listens to him who praises Him."
[803]
Abdullah b. Zaid-he who was shown the call (for prayer in a dream) narrated it on the authority of Mas'ad al-Ansiri who said: We were sitting in the company of Sa'id b. 'Ubida when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to us.Bashir b. S'ad said : Allah has commanded us to bless you. Messenger of Allah!But how should we bless you ? He (the narrator) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) kept quiet (and we were so much perturbed over his silence) that we wished we had not asked him.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then said: (For blessing me) say: "0 Allah, bless Muhammad and the members of his household as Thou didst bless the mernbers of Ibrahim's household. Grant favours to Muhammad and the members of his household as Thou didst grant favours to the members of the household of Ibrahim in the world.Thou art indeed Praiseworthy and Glorious"; and salutation as you know.
[804]
Ibn Abi Laila reported: Ka'b b. 'Ujra met me and said: Should I not offer you a present (and added) : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to us and we said: We have learnt how to invoke peace upon you; (kindly tell us) how we should bless you.He (the Holy Prophet) said: Say: "O Allah: bless Muhammad and his family as Thou didst bless the family of Ibrahim.Verily Thou art Praiseworthy and Glorious, O Allah."
[805]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Mis'ar on the authority of al-Hakam, but in the hadith transmitted by Mis'ar these words are not found: "Should I not offer you a present ?"
[806]
A hadith like this has been narrated by al-Hakam except that he said: "Bless Muhammad (may peace be upon him)" and he did not say: "O Allah I
[807]
Abu Humaid as-Sa'idi reported: They (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) said : Apostle of Allah, how should we bless you ? He (the Holy Prophet) observed: Say: "O Allah! bless Muhammad, his wives and his offspring as Thou didst bless Ibrahim, and grant favours to Muhammad, and his wives and his offspring as Thou didst grant favours to the family of Ibrahim ; Thou art Praiseworthy and Glorious."
[808]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who blesses me once, Allah would bless him ten times.
[809]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the Imam says: "Allah listens to him who praises Him." you should say: "O Allah, our Lord for Thee is the praise." for if what anyone says synchronises with what the angels say, his past sins will be forgiven.
[810]
A hadith like this is narrated by Abd Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[811]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: SayAmin when the Imam says Amin, for it anyone's utterance of Amin synchronises with that of the angels,he will be forgiven his past sins.
[812]
Abu Huraira said: I heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) the hadith like one transmitted by Malik, but he made no mention of the words of Shibab.
[813]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When anyone amongst you utters Amin in prayer and the angels in the sky also utter Amin, and this (utterance of the one) synchronises with (that of) the other, all his previous sins are pardoned.
[814]
Abu Harare reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When anyone amongst you utters Amin and the angels In the heaven also utter Amin and (the Amin) of the one synchronises with (that of) the other, all his previous sins are pardoned.
[815]
'A hadith like this is transmitted by Ma'mar from Hammam b. Munabbih on the authority of Abu Huraira who reported it from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[816]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the reciter (Imam) utters: "Not of those on whom (is Thine) wrath and not the erring ones," and (the person) behind him utters Amin and his utterance synchronises with that of the dwellers of heavens, all his previous sins would be pardoned.
[817]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) fell down from a horse and his right side was grazed.We went to him to inquire after his health when the time of prayer came.He led us in prayer in a sitting posture and we said prayer behind him sitting, and when he finished the prayer hesaid : The Imam is appointed only to be followed; so when he recites takbir, you should also recite that; when he prostrates, you should also prostrate; when he rises up, you should also rise up, and when he said"God listens to him who praises Him," you should say: "Our Lord, to Thee be the praise," and when he prays sitting, all of you should pray sitting.
[818]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) fell down from a horse and he was grazed and he led the prayer for us sitting, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[819]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) fell down from a horse and his right side was grazed, and the rest of the hadith is the same with the addition of these words: "When he (the Imam) says prayer standing, you should also do so."
[820]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) rode a horse and fell down from it and his right side was grazed, and the rest of the hadith is the same, and (these words) are found in it: "When he (the Imam) says prayer in an erect posture, you should also say it in an erect posture."
[821]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) fell down from his horse and his right side was grazed, and the rest of the hadith is the same.In this hadith there are no additions (of words) as transmitted by Yunus and Malik.
[822]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) fell ill and some of his Companions came to inquire after his health.The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) said prayer sitting, while (his Companions) said it (behind him) standing.He (the Holy Prophet) directed them by his gesture to sit down, and they sat down (in prayer).After finishing the (prayer) lie (the Holy Prophet) said: The Imam is appointed so that be should be followed, so bow down when lie bows down, and rise rip when he rises up and say (prayer) sitting when he (the Imam) says (it) sitting.
[823]
This hadith is narrated with the same chain of transmitters by Hisham b. 'Urwa.
[824]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was ill and we said prayer behind him and he was sitting. And Abu Bakr was making audible to the people his takbir.As he paid his attention towards us he saw us standing and (directed us to sit down) with a gesture.So we sat down and said our prayer with his prayer in a sitting posture.After uttering salutation he said: You were at this time about to do an act like that of the Persians and the Romans. They stand before their kings while they sit, so don't do that; follow your Imams. If they say prayer standing, you should also do so, and if they say prayer sitting, you should also say prayer sitting.
[825]
Jabir said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led the prayer and Abu Bakr was behind him. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited the takbir, Abu Bakr also recited (it) in order to make it audible to us.And the rest of the hadith is like one transmitted by Laith.
[826]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The Imam is appointed, so that he should be followed, so don't be at variance with him.Recite takbir when he recites it; bow down when he bows down and when he says: "Allah listens to him who praises Him," say: "O Allah, our Lord, to Thee be the Praise." And when he (the Imam) prostrates, you should also prostrate, and when he says prayer sitting, you should all observe prayer sitting.
[827]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Hammam b. Munabbih from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[828]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) while teaching us (the principles of faith), said: Do not try to go ahead of the Imam, recite takbir when he recites it. and when he says: "Nor of those who err," you should say Amin, bow down when lie bows down, and when he says: "Allah listens to him who praises Him," say: "O Allah, our Lord, to Thee be the praise".
[829]
Abu Huraira reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) (a hadith) like it, except the words: "Nor of those who err, say Amin" and added: "And don't rise up ahead of him."
[830]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Verily the Imam is a shield,say prayer sitting when he says prayer sitting.And when he says: "Allah listens to him who praises Him," say: "O Allah, our Lord, to Thee be the praise." and when the utterance of the people of the earth synchronises with that of the beings of heaven (angels), all the previous sins would be pardoned.
[831]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: The Imamis appointed to be followed.So recite takbir when he recites it, and bow down when he bows down and when he utters: "Allah listens to him who praises Him," say"O Allah, our Lordfor Thee be the praise." And when he prays, standing, you should pray standing.And when he prays sitting, all of you should pray sitting.
[832]
Ubaidullah b. Abdullah reported: I visited 'A'isha and asked her to tell about the illness of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).She agreed and said: The Apostle (may peace be upon him) was seriously ill and he asked whether the people had prayed.We said: No, they are waiting for you, Messenger of Allah.He (the Holy Prophet) said: Put some water in the tub for me.We did accordingly and he (the Holy Prophet) took a bath ;and, when he was about to move with difficulty, he fainted.When he came round, he again said: Have the people said prayer?We said: No, they are waiting for you, Messenger of Allah. He (the Holy Prophet) again said: Put some water for me in the tub.We did accordingly and he took a bag, but when he was about to move with difficultyhe fainted.When he came round, he asked whether the people had prayed.We said: No, they are waiting for you, Messenger of Allah.He said: Put some water for me in the tub.We did accordingly and he took a bath and he was about to move with difficulty when he fainted.When he came roundhe said: Have the people saidprayer?We said: No, they are waiting for you, Messenger of Allah.She ('A'isha) said: The people were staying in the mosque and waiting for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) to lead the last (night) prayer.She ('A'isha) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent (instructions) to Abu Bakr to lead the people in prayer.When the messenger came, he told him (Abd Bakr): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has ordered you to lead the people in prayer.Abu Bakr who was a man of very tenderly feelings asked Umar to lead the prayer.'Umar said: You are more entitled to that.Abu Bakr led the prayers during those days.Afterwards the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) felt some relief and he went out supported by two men, one of them was al-'Abbas, to the noon prayer.Abu Bakr was leading the people in prayer.When Abu Bakr saw him. he began to withdraw, but the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) told him not to withdraw.He told his two (companions) to seat him down beside him (Abu Bakr). They seated him by the side of Abu Bakr.Abu Bakr said the prayer standing while following the prayer of the Apostle (way peace be upon him) and the people Bald prayer (standing) while following the prayer of Abu Bakr.The Apostle (may peace be upon him) was seated.Ubaidullah said: I visited 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas, and said: Should I submit to you what 'A'isha had told about the illness of the Apostle (may peace be upon him)?He said: Go ahead.I submitted to him what had been transmitted by her ('A'isha).He objected to none of it, only asking whether she had named to him the man who accompanied al-'Abbas. I said: No. He said: It was 'Ali.
[833]
'A'isha reported: It was in the house ofMaimuna that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) first fell ill.He asked permission from his wives to stay in her ('A'isha's) house during his illness. They granted him permission.She ('A'isha) narrated: He (the Holy Prophet) went out (for prayer) with his hand over al-Fadl b. 'Abbas and on the other hand there was another person and (due to weakness) his feet dragged on the earth.'Ubaidullah said: I narrated this hadith to the son of 'Abbas ('Abdullah b. 'Abbas) and he said: Do you know who the man was whose name 'A'isha did not mention?It was 'Ali.
[834]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) fell ill and his illness became serious, he asked permission from his wives to stay in my house during his illness.They gave him permission to do so.He stepped out (of'A'isha's apartment for prayer) supported by two persons. (He was so much weak) that his feet dragged on the ground and he was being supported by 'Abbas b. 'Abd al-Muttalib and another person.'Ubaidullah said: I informed 'Abdullah (b.'Abbas) about that which 'A'isha had said.'Abdullah b. 'Abbas said: Do you know the man whose name 'A'isha did not mention ? He said: No. Ibn 'Abbas said: It was 'Ali.
[835]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), said: I tried to dissuade the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) from it (i.e. from appointing Abu Bakr as the Imam.) and my insistence upon it was not due to the fact that I entertained any apprehension in my mind that the people would not love the man who would occupy his (Prophet's) place (i.e. who would be appointed as his caliph) and I feared that the people would be superstitious about one who would occupy his place. I, therefore, desired that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) should leave Abu Bakr aside in this matter.
[836]
'A'isha reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to my house, he said: Ask Abu Bakr to lead people in prayer.'A'isha narrated: I said, Messenger of Allah, Abu Bakr is a man of tenderly feelings; as he recites the Qur'an, he cannot help shedding tears: so better command anyone else to lead the prayer.By Allah, there is nothing disturbing in it for me but the idea that the people may not takeevil omen with regard to one who is the first to occupy the place of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).I tried to dissuade him (the Holy Prophet) twice or thrice (from appointing my father as an Imam in prayer), but he ordered Abu Bakr to lead the people in prayer and said: You women are like those (who had) surrounded Yusuf.
[837]
'A'isha reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was confined to bed, Bilal came to him to summon him to prayer.He (the Holy Prophet) said: Ask Abu Bakr to lead the people in prayer.She ('A'isha) reported: I said: Messenger of Allah,Abu!Bakr is a tenderhearted man,go when ]be would stand at your place (he would be so overwhelmed by feelings) that he would not be able to make the people hear anything (his recitation would not be audible to the followers in prayer).You should better order Umar (to lead the prayer).He (the Holy Prophet) said: Ask Abu Bakr to lead people in- prayer.She ('A'isha) said: I asked Hafsa to (convey) my impression to him (the Holy Prophet) that Abu Bakr was a tenderhearted man, so when he would stand at his place, he would not be able to make the people bear anything. He better order Umar.Hafsa conveyed this (message of Hadrat 'A'isha) to him (the Holy Prophet).The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: (You are behaving) as if you are the females who had gathered around Yusuf.Order Abd Bakr to lead the people in prayer.She ('A'isha) reported: So Abu Bakr was ordered to lead the people in prayer.As the prayer began, the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) felt some relief; he got up and moved supported by two persons and his feet dragged on earth (due to excessive weakness).'A'isha reported: As he (the Holy Prophet) entered the mosque.Abu Bakr perceived his (arrival).He was about to with. draw, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) by the gesture (of This hand) told him to keep standing at his place.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came and seated himself on the left side of Abu Bakr.She ('A'isha) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was leading people in prayer sitting.Abu Bakr was following the prayer of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) in a standing posture and the people were following the prayer of Abu Bakr.
[838]
A'mash reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) suffered from illness of which he died, and in the hadith transmitted by Ibn Mus-hir, the words are: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was brought till he was seated by his (Abu Bakr's) side and the Apostle (may peace be upon him) led the people in prayer and Abu Bakr was making takbir audible to them, and in the hadith transmitted by 'Isa the (words are): "The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sat and led the people in prayer and Abu Bakr was by his side and he was making (takbir) audible to the people."
[839]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered Abu Bakr that he should lead people in prayer during his illness, and he led them In prayer.'Urwa said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) felt relief and went (to the mosque) and Abd Bakr was leading the people in prayer.When Abel Bakr saw him he began to withdraw, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) signed him to remain where he was.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sat opposite to Abu Bakr by his side.Abu Bakr said prayer following the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and the people said prayer following the prayer of Abu Bakr.
[840]
Anas b. Malik reported, Abu Bakr led them in prayer due to the illness of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) of which be died.It was a Monday and they stood in rows for prayer.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) drew aside the curtain of ('A'isha's) apartment and looked at us while he was standing, and his (Prophet's) face was (as bright) as the paper of the Holy Book. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) felt happy and smiled.And we were confounded with joy while in prayer due to the arrival (among our midst) of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), Abu Bakr stepped back upon his heels to say prayer in a row perceiving that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had come out for prayer.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with the help of his hand signed to them to complete their prayer.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went back (to his apartment) and drew the curtain.He (the narrator) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) breathed his last on that very day.
[841]
Anas reported: The last glance that I have had of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (before his death) was that when he on Monday drew the curtain aside.The hadith transmitted by Salih is perfect and complete.
[842]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik by another chain of transmitters.
[843]
Anas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not come to us for three days.When the prayer was about to start.Abu Bakr stepped forward (to lead the prayer), and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) lifted the curtain.When the face of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) became visible to us, we (found) that no sight was more endearing to us than the face of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as it appeared to us.The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) with the gesture of his hand directed Abu Bakr to step forward (and lead the prayer).The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) then drew the curtain, and we could not see him till he died.
[844]
Abu Musa reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) became ill and illness became serious he ordered Abu Bakr to lead the people in prayer.Upon this 'A'isha said: Messenger of Allah, Abd Bakr is a man of tenderly feelings: when he would stand in your place (he would be so much overwhelmed -by grief that) he would not be able to lead the people in prayer.He (the Holy Prophet) said: You order Abu Bakr to lead the people in prayer, and added: You are like the female companions of Yusuf.So Abu Bakr led the prayer (during this period of illness) in the life of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[845]
Sahl b. Sa'd al-Sa'idi reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went to the tribe of Bani Amr b. Auf in order to bring reconciliation amongst (its members), and It was a time of prayer.The Mu'adhdhin came to Abu Bakr and said: Would you lead the prayer in case I recite takbir (tahrima, with which the prayer begins)?He (Abu Bakr) said : Yes.He (the narrator) said: He (Abu Bakr) started (leading) the prayer.The people were engaged in observing prayer when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to come there and made his way (through the people) till he stood in a row.The people began to clap (their hands), but Abu Bakr paid no heed (to it) in prayer.When the people clapped more vigorously, he (Abu Bakr) then paid heed and saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) there. (He was about to withdraw when) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) signed to him to keep standing at his place.Abu Bakr lifted his hands and praised Allah for what the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had commanded him and then Abu Bakr withdrew himself till he stood in the midst of the row and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stepped forward and led the prayer. When (the prayer) was over, he (the Holy Prophet) said: 0 Abu Bakr, what prevented you from standing (at that place) as I ordered you to do?Abu Bakr said : It does not become the son of Abu Quhafa to lead prayer before the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said (to the people) around him : What is it that I saw you clapping so vigorously? (Behold) when anything happens in prayer, say: Subha Allah, for when you would utter it, it would attract the attention, while clapping of hands is meant for women.
[846]
This hadith is transmitted by Sahl b. Sa'd in the same way as narrated by Malik, with the exception of these words: "Abu Bakr lifted his hands and praised Allah and retraced his (steps) till he stood in a row."
[847]
Sahl b. Sa'd al-Sa'idi reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) went to Bani Amr b. 'Auf in order to bring about reconciliation amongst them. The rest of the hadith is the same but with (the addition of these words): "The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came and made his way through the rows till he came to the first row and Abu Bakr retraced his steps."
[848]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported that he participated In the expedition of Tabuk along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out to answer the call of nature before the morning prayer. and I carried along with him a jar (full of water).When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came back to me (after relieving himself). I began to pour water upon his hands out of the jar and he washed his hands three times, then washed his face three times.He then tried to tuck up the sleeves of his cloak upon his forearms but since the sleeves were tight he inserted his hands in the cloak and then brought out his forearms up to the elbow below the cloak, and then wiped over his shoes and then moved on.Mughira said: I also moved along with him till he came to the people and (he found) that they had been saying their prayer under the Imamah of 'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) could get one rak ah out of two and said (this) last rak'ah along with the people.When Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf pronounced the salutation, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up to complete the prayer.This made the Muslims terrified and most of them began to recite the glory of the Lord.When the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) finished his prayer, he turned towards them and then said: You did well, or said with a sense of joy: You did the right thing that you said prayer at the appointed hour.
[849]
This hadith is narrated by Hamza b. Mughira by another chain of trans- mitters (but with the addition of these words) : I made up my mind to hold Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf back, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Leave him."
[850]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : Glorification of Allah is for men and clapping of hands is meant for women (if something happens in prayer). Harmala added in his narration that Ibn Shihab told him: I saw some of the scholars glorifying Allah and making a gesture.
[851]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[852]
This hadith is transmitted by Muhammad b. Rafi', Abu'I-Razzaq.Ma'mar, Hammam on the authority of Abu Huraira with the addition of (the word) "prayer".
[853]
Abu Huraira reported: one day the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led the prayer.Then turning (towards his Companions) he said: 0 you, the man, why don't you say your prayer well? Does the observer of prayer not see how he is performing the prayer for he performs it for himself ? By Allah, I see behind me as I see In front of me.
[854]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do you find me seeing towards the Qibla only?By Allah, your bowing and your prostrating are not hidden from my view.Verily I see them behind my back.
[855]
Anas b. Malik reported.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : Perform bowing and prostration well.By Allah.I see you even if you are behind me, or he said'. (1 see you) behind my back when you bow or prostrate.
[856]
Anas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Complete the bowing and prostration well.By Allah, I see you behind my back as to how you bow and prostrate or when you bow and prostrate.
[857]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one day led us in the prayer. and when he completed the Prayer he turned his face towards us and said : 0 People, I am your Imam, so do not precede me in bowing and prostration and in standing and turning (faces, i.e. In pronouncing salutation), for I see you in front of me and behind me, and then said : By Him in Whose hand Is the life of Muhammad, if you could see what I see, you would have laughed little and wept much more.They said : What did you see, Messenger of Allah?He replied: (I saw) Paradise and Hell.
[858]
This hadith is narrated by Anas with another chain of transmitters, and in the hadith transmitted by Jarir there is no mention of "turning (faces)".
[859]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Does the man who lifts his head ahead of the Imam (from prostration) not fear that Allah may change his head into the head of an ass?
[860]
Abu Huraira reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Does the man who lifts his head before the Imam not fear that Allah may change his face into that of an ass?
[861]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters except for the words narrated by Rabi' b. Muslim : "Allah may make his face like the face of an ass."
[862]
Jabir b. Samura reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : The people who lift their eyes towards the sky in Prayer should avoid it or they would lose their eyesight.
[863]
Abu Huraira reported: People should avoid lifting their eyes towards the sky while supplicating in prayer, otherwise their eyes would be snatched away.
[864]
Jabir b. Samura reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to us and said: How is it that I see you lifting your hands like the tails of headstrong horses? Be calm in prayer.He (the narrator) said: He then again came to us and saw us (sitting) in circles; he said: How is it that I see you in separate groups? He (the narrator) said: He again came to us and said: Why don't you draw yourselves up in rows as angels do in the presence of their Lord?We said: Messenger of Allah, bow do the angels draw themselves up in rows in the presence of their Lord?He (the Holy Prophet) said: They make the first rows complete and keep close together in the row.
[865]
This hadith has been narrated by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[866]
Jabir b. Samura reported: When we said prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), we pronounced: Peace be upon you and Mercy of Allah, peace be upon you and Mercy of Allah, and made gesture with the hand on both the sides.Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him said: What do you point out with your hands as if they are the tails of headstrong horses?This is enough for you that one should place one's hand on one's thigh and then pronounce salutation upon one's brother on the right side and then on the left.
[867]
Jabir b. Samura reported: We said our prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and, while pronouncing salutations, we made gestures with our hands (indicating) "Peace be upon you, peace be upon you." The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) looked towards us and said: Why is it that you make gestures with your hands like the tails of headstrong horses?When any one of you pro- nounces salutation (in prayer) he should only turn his face towards his companion and should not make a gesture with his hand.
[868]
Abu Mas'ud reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) used to touch our shoulders in prayer and say: Keep straight, don't be irregular, for there would be dissension in your hearts. Let those of you who are sedate and prudent be near me, then those who are next to them, then those who are next to them. Abu Mas'ud said: Now-a-days there is much dissension amongst you.
[869]
This hadith is narrated by Ibn Uyaina with the same chain of transmitters.
[870]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Let those who are sedate and prudent be near me, then those who are next to them (saying it tliree tinies), and beware of the tumult of the markets.
[871]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Straighten your rows. for the straightening of a row is a part of the perfection of prayer.
[872]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Complete the rows, for I can see you behind my back.
[873]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: This is what was transmitted to us by Abu Huraira from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and, while making a mention of a few ahadith, said: (The Messengerof Allah directed us thus): Establish rows in prayer, for the making of a row (straight) is one of the merits of prayer.
[874]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Straighten your rows, or Allah would create dissension amongst you.
[875]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace-be upon him) used to straighten our rows as it lie were straightening an arrow with their help until be saw that we had learnt it from him.One day he came out, stood up (for prayer) and was about to say: Allah is the Greatest, when he saw a man, whose chest was bulging out from the row, so he said: Servants of Allah, you hint straighten your rows or Allah would create dissension amongst you.
[876]
Abu 'Awana reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters.
[877]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If the people were to know what excellence is there in the Adhan and in the first row, and they could not (get these opportunities) except by drawing lots, they would have definitely done that.And if they were to know what excellence lies in joining the prayer in the first takbir (prayer), they would have vied with one another.And if they were to know what excellence lies in the night prayer and morning prayer, they would have definitely come even if crawling (on their knees).
[878]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw (a tendency ) among his Companions to go to the back, so he said to them: Come forward and follow my lead, and let those who come after you follow your lead. People will continue to keep back till Allah will put them at the back.
[879]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw people at the end of the mosque, and then the (above-mentioned hadith) was narrated.
[880]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If you were to know, or if they were to know, what (excellence) lies in the first rows, there would have been drawing of lots (for filling them); and Ibn Harb said: For (occupying) the first row there would have been drawing of lots.
[881]
Abu Huraira said: The best rows for men are the first rows, and the worst ones the last ones, and the best rows for women are the last ones and the worst ones for them are the first ones.
[882]
This hadith is narrated by Suhail with the same chain of transmitters.
[883]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported: I saw men having tied (the ends) of their lower garments around their necks, like children, due to shortage of cloth and offering their prayers behind the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).One of the proclaimers said: O womenfolk, do not lift your heads till men raise (them).
[884]
Salim narrated it from his father ('Abdullah b. Umar) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When women ask permission for going to the mosque, do not prevent them.
[885]
Abdullah b. Umar reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Don't prevent your women from going to the mosque when they seek your permission.Bilal b. 'Abdullah said: By Allah, we shall certainly prevent them. On this'Abdullah b. Umar turned towards him and reprimanded him to harshly as I had never heard him do before. He ('Abdullah b. Umar) said: I am narrating to you that which comes from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and you (have the audicity) to say: By Allah, we shall certainly prevent them.
[886]
Ibn 'Umar reported:'The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do not prevent the maid-servants of Allah from going to the mosque.
[887]
lbn Umar reported: I heard the Messeinger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: When your women seek your permission for going to the mosque, you grant them (permission).
[888]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do not prevent women from going to the mosque at night.A boy said to 'Abdullah b. Umar: We would never let them go out, that they may not be caught in evil.He (the narrator) said: Ibn Umar reprimanded him and said.. I am saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said this, but you say: We would not allow !
[889]
A hadith like this has been narrated by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[890]
Ibn 'Umar reported: Grant permission to women for going to the mosque in the night.His son who was called Waqid said: Then they would make mischief.He (the narrator) said: He thumped his (son's) chest and said: I am narrating to you the hadith of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and you say: No !
[891]
Ibn Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do not deprive women of their share of the mosques, when they seek permission from you. Bilal said: By Allah, we would certainly prevent them.'Abdullah said: I say that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said it and you say: We would certainly prevent them !
[892]
Zainab Thaqafiya reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you (women) participates in the 'Isha' prayer, she should not perfume herself that night.
[893]
Zainab, the wife of Abdullah (b.'Umar), reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to us: When any one of you comes to the mosque, she should not apply perfume.
[894]
Abu Huraira said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Whoever (woman) fumigates herself with perfume should not join us in the 'Isha' prayer.
[895]
'Amra, daughter of Abd al-Rahmin, reported: I heard 'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). say: If the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had seen what new things the women have introduced (in their way of life) he would have definitely prevented them from going to the mosque, as the women of BaniIsra'il were prevented.
[896]
This hadith has been narrated by Yahya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[897]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The word of (Allah) Great and Glorious: 'And utter not thy prayer loudly, nor be low in it" (xvii. 110) was revealed as the Messenger of Allah (may peace beupon him) was hiding himself in Mecca. When he led his Companions in prayer he raised his voice (while reciting the) Qur'an. And when the polytheists heard that, they reviled the Qur'an and Him Who revealed it and him who brought it. Upon this Allah, the Exalted, said to His Apostle (may peace be upon him): Utter not thy prayer so loudly that the polytheists may hear thy recitation and (recite it) not so low that it may be inaudible to your Companions. Make them hear the Qur'an, but do not recite it loudly and seek a (middle) way between these. Recite between loud and low tone.
[898]
'A'isha reported that so far as these words of (Allah) Glorious and High are concerned: "And utter not thy prayer loudly, not be low in it" (xvii. 110) relate to supplication (du'a').
[899]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[900]
Ibn 'Abbas reported with regard to the words of Allah, Great and Glorious: "Move not thy tongue therewith" (Ixxv. 16) that when Gabriel brought revelation to him (the Holy Prophet) he moved his tongue and lips (with a view to committing it to memory instantly). This was something hard for him and it was visible (from his face). Then Allah, the Exalted. revealed this a "Move not thy tongue therewith to make haste (in memorising it). Surely on us rests the collecting of it and the reciting of it" (ixxv.16), i.e. Verily it rests with Us that We would preserve it in your heart and (enable you) to recite it You would recite it when We would recite it and so follow its recitation, and He (Allah) said: "We revealed it, so listen to it attentively. Verily its exposition rests with Us. i.e. We would make it deliver by your tongue." So when Gabriel came to him (to the Holy Prophet), he kept silence, and when he went away he recited as Allah had promised him.
[901]
Ibn Abbas reported with regard to the words: "Do not move thy tongue there with to make haste," that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) felt it hard and he moved his lips.Ibn 'Abbas said to me (Sa'id b. Jubair) : I move them just as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) moved them. Then said Sa'id: I move them just as Ibn 'Abbas moved them, and he moved his lips. Allah, the Exalted, revealed this: "Do not move your tongue therewith to make haste. It is with US that its collection rests and its recital" (al-Qur'an, ixxv. 16). He said: Its preservation in your heart and then your recital. So when We recite it, follow its recital.He said: Listen to it, and be silent and then it rests with Us that you recite it. So when Gabriel came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), he listened to him attentively, and when Gabriel went away, the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited as he (Gabriel) had recited it.
[902]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) neither recited the Qur'an to the Jinn nor did he see them. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out with some of his Companions with the intention of going to the bazaar of 'Ukaz And there had been (at that time) obstructions between satans and the news from the Heaven, and there were flung flames upon them. So satan went back to their people and they said: What has happened to you ? They said : There have been created obstructions between us and the news from the Heaven. And there have been flung upon us flames. They said: It cannot happen but for some (important) event. So traverse the eastern parts of the earth and the western parts and find out why is it that there have been created obstructions between us and the news from the Heaven. So they went forth and traversed the easts of the earth and its wests. Some of them proceeded towards Tihama and that is a nakhl towards the bazaar of 'Ukaz and he (the Holy Prophet) was leading his Companions in the morning prayer. So when they heard the Qur'an. they listened to it attentively and said: It is this which has caused obstruction between us and news from the Heaven. They went back to their people and said: O our people, we have heard a strange Qur'an which directs us to the right path; so we affirm our faith in it and we would never associate anyone with our Lord. And Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed to His Apostle Muhammad (may peace be upon him): "It has been revealed to me that a party of Jinn listened to it" (Qur'an, lxxii. 1).
[903]
Dawud reported from 'Amir who said: I asked 'Alqama if Ibn Mas'ud was present with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the night of the Jinn (the night when the Holy Prophet met them). He (Ibn Mas'uad) said: No, but we were in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one night and we missed him. We searched for him in the valleys and the hills and said. He has either been taken away (by jinn) or has been secretly killed. He (the narrator) said. We spent the worst night which people could ever spend. When it was dawn we saw him coming from the side of Hiri'. He (the narrator) reported. We said: Messenger of Allah, we missed you and searched for you, but we could not find you and we spent the worst night which people could ever spend. He (the Holy Prophet) said: There came to me an inviter on behalf of the Jinn and I went along with him and recited to them the Qur'an. He (the narrator) said: He then went along with us and showed us their traces and traces of their embers. They (the Jinn) asked him (the Holy Prophet) about their provision and he said: Every bone on which the name of Allah is recited is your provision. The time it will fall in your hand it would be covered with flesh, and the dung of (the camels) is fodder for your animals. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Don't perform istinja with these (things) for these are the food of your brothers (Jinn).
[904]
This hadith has been reported by Dawud with the same chain of transmitters up to the word(s) : "The traces of their embers." Sha'bi said : They (the Jinn) asked about their provision, and they were the Jinn of al-jazira, up to the end of the hadith, and the words of Sha'bi have been directly transmitted from the hadith of Abdullah.
[905]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah from the Apostle (may peace be upon him) up to the words: "The traces of the embers," but he made no mention of what followed afterward.
[906]
Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) said: I was not with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) but I wish I were with him.
[907]
Ma'n reported.. I heard it from my father who said: I asked Masruq who informed the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the night when they heard the Qur'an. He said: Your father, Ibn Mas'ud, narrated it to me that a tree informed him about that.
[908]
Abu Qatada reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in prayer and recited in the first two rak'ahs of the noon and afternoon prayers Surat al-Fitiha and two (other) surahs. And he would sometimes recite loud enough for us the verses. He would prolong the first rak'ah more than the second. And he acted similarly in the morning prayer.
[909]
Abu Qatada reported it on the authority of his father: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would recite in the first two rak'ahs of the noon and afternoon prayers the opening chapter of the Book and another surah. He would sometimes recite loud enough to make audible to us the verse and would recite in the last two rak'ahs Surat al-Faitiha (only).
[910]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: We used to estimate how long Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood in the noon and afternoon prayers, and we estimated hat he stood in the first two rak'ahs of the noon prayer as long as it takes to recite Alif Lam Mim, Tanzil, i.e. as-Sajda. We estimated that he stood half that time in the last two rak'ahs; that he stood in the first two of the afternoon as long as he did in the last two at noon; and in the last two of the afternoon prayer about half that time.
Abu Bakr in his narration has made no mention of Alif Lam Mim, Tanzil, but said: As long as it takes to recite thirty verses.
[911]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in every rak'ah of the first two rak'ahs of the noon prayer about thirty verses and in the last two about fifteen verses or half (of the first rak'ah) and in every rak'ah of the 'Asr prayer of the first two rak'ahs about fifteen verses and in the last two verses half (of the first ones).
[912]
Jabir b. Samura reported: The people of Kufa complained to Umar b. Khattab about Sa'id and they made a mention of his prayer. 'Umar sent for him. He came to him. He ('Umar) totd him that the people had found fault with his prayer. He said: I lead them in prayer in accorance with the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). I make no decrease in it. I make them stand for a longer time in the first two (rak'ahs) and shorten it in the last two. Upon this 'Umar remarked: This is what I deemed of thee, O Abu Ishaq
[913]
This hadith his been narrated by 'Abu al-Malik with the same chain of transmitters.
[914]
Jabir b. Samura reported: 'Umar said to Sa'd: They complain against you in every matter, even in prayer. He (Sa'd) said: I prolong (standing) in the first two (rak'ahs) and shorten it in the last two, and I make no negligence in following the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He ('Umar) remarked: This is what is expected of you, or, that is what I deemed of you.
[915]
This hadith is narrated by Jabir b. Samura but with the addition of these words: "(Sa'd said): These bedouins presume to teach me prayer."
[916]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The noon prayer would start and one would go to al-Baqi' and after having relieved himself he would perform ablution and then come, while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would be in the first rak'ah, because he would prolong it so much.
[917]
Qaz'a reported: I came to Abu Sa'id al-Khudri and he was surrounded by people. When the people departed from him I said: I am not going to ask you what these people have been asking you. I want to ask you about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He (Abu Sa'id) said: There is no good for you in this. He (Qaz'a), however, repeated (his demand). He then said: The noon prayer would start and one of us would go to Baqi' and, having relieved himself, would come to his home, then perform ablution and go to the mosque, and (he would find) The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the first rak'ah.
[918]
Abdullah b. Sa'id reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in the morning prayer in Mecca and began Sarat al-Mu'minin (xxiii ) but when he came to the mention of Moses and Aaron (verse. 45) or to the mention of Jesus (verse 50), a cough got the better of him, and he bowed. 'Abdullah b. Sa'ib was present there, and in the hadith narrated by Abd al-Razzaq (the words are): He cut short (the recitation) and bowed.
[919]
'Amr b. Huwairith reported: I heard the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recite in the morning prayer " Wa'l-lail-i-idhd 'As'asa" (ixxxi. 17).
[920]
Qutba b. Malik reported : I said prayer and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led it and he recited "Qaf. (I.). By the Glorious Qur'an," till he recited "and the tall palm trees" (l. 10). I wanted to repeat it but I could not follow its significance.
[921]
Qutba b. Malik reported that he had heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting in the morning prayer this: "And the tall palm trees having flower spikes piled one above another" (l. 10).
[922]
Ziyad b. 'Ilaqa reported it on the authority of his uncle that he said the morning prayer with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he recited in the first rak'ah: "And the tall palm trees having flower spikes piled one above another (l. 10) or perhaps Sarah Qaf.
[923]
Jabir b. Samura reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in the morning prayer "Qaf. By the Glorious Quran." and his prayer afterward shortened.
[924]
Simak asked Jabir b. Samura about the prayer of the Apostle (may peace be upon him). He said: He (the Holy Prophet) shortened the prayer and he did not pray like these people then, and he informed me that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite "Qaf. By the (Glorious) Qur'an," and a passage of similar length.
[925]
Jabir b. Samura reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in the noon prayer: "By the night when it envelopes" (xcii.), and in the afternoon like this, but he prolonged the morning prayer as compared to that (noon and afternoon prayers).
[926]
Jabir b. Samura reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in the noon prayer: "Glorify the name of thy Most High Lord in the morning prayer longer than this" (lxxxvii.)
[927]
Abu Barza reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in the morning prayer from sixty to one hundred verses.
[928]
Abu Barza Aslami reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite from sixty to one hundred verses in the morning prayer.
[929]
Ibn Abbas reported: Umm al-Fadl daughter of al-Harith heard him reciting: "By those sent forth to spread goodness" (lxxvii.). (Upon this) she remarked: O my son, you reminded me by the recitation of this surah (the fact) that it was the last surah that I heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he recited it in the evening prayer.
[930]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "And he did not lead the player after this till his death."
[931]
Jubair b. Mut'im reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting Surat al-Tur (Mountain) (lii) in the evening prayer.
[932]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[933]
'Adi reported: I heard al-Bara' narrating it from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) that while in a journey he said the night prayer and recited in one of the two rak'ahs: "By the Fig and the Olive" (Su'rah xcv.).
[934]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported that he said prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he recited: "By the Fig and the Olive."
[935]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported: I heard the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting in the night prayer: "By the Fig and the Olive," and I have never heard anyone with a sweeter voice than he.
[936]
Jabir reported that Mu'adh b. jabal used to pray with the Apostle (may peace be upon him), then came and led his people in prayer. One night he said the night prayer with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). He then came to his people and led them in prayerbeginning with Surat al-Baqara. A man turned aside, pronounced the taslim (salutation for concluding the prayer), then prayed alone and departed. The people said to him: Have you become a hypocrite, so and so? He said: I swear by Allah that I have not, but I will certainly go to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and will inform (him) about this. He then came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, we look after camels used for watering and work by day. Mu'idh said the night prayer with you. He then came and began with Surat al-Baqara. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then turned to Mu'adh and said: Are you there to (put the people) to trial ? Recite such and recite such (and such a surah). It is transmitted on the authority of Jabir, as told by Sufyan, that he (the Holy Prophet) had said: "By the Sun and its morning brightness" (Sarah xci.), "By brightness" (Surah xciii)"By the night when it spreads" (Surah xcii.), and "Glorify the name of thy most high Lord" (Surah lxxxii.).
[937]
Jabir reported: 'Mu'adh b jabal al-Ansari led his companions in the night prayer and prolonged it for them. A person amongst us said prayer (after having separated himself from the congregation). Mu'adh was informed of this, and he remarked that he wasa hypocrite. When it (the remark) was conveyed to the man, he went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and informed him of what Mu'adh had said. Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: Mu'adh, do you want to become a person putting (people) to trial? When you lead people in prayer, recite: "By the Sun and its morning brightness" (Surah xci.), "Glorify the name of thy most high Lord" (Surah lxxxvi.) and "Read in the name of Lord" (Surah xcvi.), and "By the night when it spreads" (Surah xcii.).
[938]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Mu'adh b. Jabal said the night prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and then returned to his people and then led them in this prayer.
[939]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: Mu'adh said the night prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He then came to the mosque of his people and led them in prayer.
[940]
Abu Mas'ud al-Ainsari reported: A person came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: I keep away from the morning prayer on account of such and such (a man), because; he keeps us so long. I never saw God's Messenger (may peace be upon him) more angry when giving an exhortation than he was that day. He said: 0 people, some of you are scaring people away. So whoever of you leads the people in prayer he must be brief, for behind him are the weak, the aged, and the people who have (argent) business to attend.
[941]
This hadith like one narrated by Hashalm has been narrated from Isma'il with the same chain of transmitters.
[942]
Abu Huraira reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you leads the people in prayer, he should be brief for among them are the young and the aged, the weak and the sick. But when one of you prays by himself, he may (prolong) as he likes.
[943]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: This is what Abu Huraira transmitted to us from Muhammad the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he narrated (some) ahadith out of (these narrations and one of them is this): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you stands to lead people In prayer, he should shorten it, for amongst them are the aged, and amongst them are the weak, but when he prays by himself, he may prolong his prayer as he likes.
[944]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you leads people in prayer, he must shorten it for among them are the weak, the infirm and those who have business to attend.
[945]
Abu Bakr b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported that he had heard Abu Huraira say that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said like it, but he substituted "the aged" for 'the infirm".
[946]
Uthman b. Abu'l-'As at-Thaqafi reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: Lead your people in prayer. I said: Messenger of Allah. I perceive something (disturbing) in my soul. He (the Holy Prophet) asked me to draw near him and making me sit down in front of him he placed his hand on my breast between my nipples. and then, telling me to turn round, he placed it on my back between my shoulders. He then said: Act as an Imam for your people. He who acts as Imam of the people, he must be brief, for among them are the aged, among them are the sick, among them are the weak, and among them are the people who have business to attend. But when any of you prays alone, he may pray as he likes.
[947]
Uthman b. Abu'l-'As reported: The last thing which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) instructed me was: When you lead the people in prayer, be brief .
[948]
Anas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to be brief and perfect in prayer.
[949]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was among those whose prayers was brief and perfect.
[950]
Anas reported: I never prayed behind an Imam who was more brief and more perfect in prayer than the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[951]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would listen to the crying of a lad in the company of his mother, in prayer, and he would recite a short surah or a small surah.
[952]
Anas b. Malik reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) having said: When I begin the prayer I Intend to make it long, but I hear a boy cry. ing; I then shorten it because of his mother's feelings.
[953]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported: I noticed the prayer of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) and saw his Qiyam (standing), his bowing, and then going back to the standing posture after bowing, his prostration, his sitting between the two prostrations, and his prostration and sitting between salutation and going away, all these were nearly equal to one another.
[954]
Hakam reported: There dominated in Kufa a man whose name was men- tioned as Zaman b. al-Ash'ath, who ordered Abu 'Ubaidah b. 'Abdullah to lead people in prayer and he accordingly used to lead them. Whenever he raised his head after bowing, he stood up equal to the time that I can recite (this supplication): O Allah! our Lord! unto Thee be the praise which would fill the heavens and the earth, and that which will please Thee besides them I Worthy art Thou of all praise and glory. None can prevent that which Thou bestowest, and none can bestow that whichthou preventest. And the greatness of the great will not avail him against Thee. Hakam (the narrator) said: I made a mention of that to Abd al-Rahman ibn Abi Laila who reported: I heard al-Bara' b. 'Azib say that the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and his bowing, and when he lifted his head from bowing, and his prostration, and between the two prostrations (all these acts) were nearly proportionate. I made a mention of that to 'Ar b. Murrah and he said: I saw Ibn Abi Laili (saying the prayer), but his prayer was not like this.
[955]
Hakam reported: When Matar b. Najiya dominated Kufa he ordered Abu Ubaida to lead people in prayer, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[956]
Thabit reported it on the authority of Anas: While leading you in prayer I do not shorten anything in the prayer. I pray as I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) leading us. He (Thabit) said: Anas used to do that which I do not see you doing; when he lifted his head from bowing he stood up (so long) that one would say: He has forgotten (to baw down in prostration). And when he lifted his head from prostration, he stayed in that position, till someone would say: He has forgotten (to bow down in prostration for the second sajda).
[957]
Thabit reported it on the authority of Anas: I have never said such a light and perfect prayer as I said behind the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The prayer of the Messenger. of Allah (may peace be upon him) was well balanced. And so too was the prayer of Abu Bakr well balanced. When it was the time of 'Umar b. al-Khattab he prolonged the morning prayer. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Allah listened to him who praised Him, he stood erect till we said: He has forgotten. He then prostrated and sat between two prostration till we said: He has forgotten.
[958]
Al-Bara' (b. 'Azib), and he was no liar (but a truthful Companion of the Holy Prophet), reported: They used to say prayer behind the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). I never saw anyone bending his back at the time when he (the Holy Prophet) raised his head, till the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) placed his forehead on the ground. They then fell in prostration after him.
[959]
Al-Bara' reported, and he was no liar: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Allah listened to him who praised Him, none of us bent his back till he (the Holy Prophet) prostrated; we then, afterwards, went down in prostration.
[960]
Al-Bara' reported: They (the Companions) said prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and they bowed when he (the Holy Prophet) bowed. and when he raised his head after bowing, he pronounced: "Allah listened to him who praised Him," and we kept standing till we saw him placing his face on the ground and then we followed him.
[961]
Al-Bara' reported: When we were (in prayer) with the Messenger of Allah Allah (may peace be upon him) none of us benfft his back till we saw he prostrated. Zuhair and others reported: "till we saw him prostrating".
[962]
'Amr b. Huraith reported: I said the dawn prayer behind the Apostle of (may peace be upon him) and heard him reciting: 'Nay. I call to witness the stars, running their courses and setting" (al-Qur'an, lxxxi. 15-16) and Done of us bent his back till he completed prostration.
[963]
('Abdullah b ) Ibn Abi Aufa reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) raised his back from the rukd' he pronounced: Allah listened to him who praised Him. O Allah ! our Lord ! unto Thee be praise that would fill the heavens and the earth and fill that which will please Thee besides them.
[964]
'Abdullah b. Aufa reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite this supplication: O Allah ! our Lord, unto Thee be praise that would fill the heavens and the earth and fill that which will please Thee besides them.
[965]
Abdullah b. Abu Aufa reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite (this supplication): O Allah! our Lord, unto Thee be praise that would fill the heavens and the earth and fill that which will please Thee besides (them). O Allah ! purify me with snow, (water of) hail and with cold water; O Allah. cleanse me from the sins and errors just as a white garment is cleansed from dirt.
[966]
This hadith with the same chain of transmitters has been narrated by Shu'ba, and in the narration of Mu'adh the words are: "just as the white garment is cleansed from filth," and in the narration of Yazid: "from dirt".
[967]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) raised his head after bowing, he said : O Allah! our Lord, to Thee be the praise that would fill all the heavens and the earth, and all that it pleases Thee besides (them). O, thou art worthy of praise and glory, most worthy of what a servant says, and we all are Thy servants, no one can withhold what Thou givest or give what Thou withholdest, and riches cannot avail a wealthy person against Thee.
[968]
Ibn Abbas reported : When the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) raised his head after bowing, he said : Allah ! our Lord, to Thee be the praise that would fill the heavens and the earth and that which is between them, and that which will please Thee besides (them). Worthy art Thou of all praise and glory. No one can withhold what Thou givest, or give what Thou withholdest. And the greatness O! the great availeth not against Thee.
[969]
Ibn Abbas reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) the words: "And that would fill that which will please Thee besides (them) !" and he did not mention the subsequent (portion of supplication).
[970]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) drew aside the curtain (of his apartment) and (he saw) people in rows (saying prayer) behind Aba Bakr. And he said: Nothing remains of the glad tidings of apostlehood, except good visions which a Muslim sees or someone is made to see for him. And see that I have been forbidden to recite the Qur'an in the state of bowing and prostration. So far as Ruk'u is concerned, extol in it the Great and Glorious Lord, and while prostrating yourselves be earnest in supplication, for it is fitting that your supplications should be answered.
[971]
'Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) drew aside the curtain and his head was bandaged on account of illness in which he died. He said : O Allah, have I not delivered (Thy Message)? (He repeated it) three times. Nothing has been left out of the glad tidings of apostlebood, but good vision. which a pious servant (of Allah) sees or someone else is made to see for him. He then narrated like the hadith transmitted by Sufyan.
[972]
'Ali b. Abi Talib reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade me to recite (the Qur'an) in a state of bowing and prostration.
[973]
'Ali b. Abi Talib reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade to recite the Qur'an, while I am in the state of bowing and prostration.
[974]
'Ali b. Abi Talib reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade me from the recitation (of the Qur'an) in bowing and prostration and I do not say that he forbade you.
[975]
'Ali reported: My loved one (the Holy Prophet) forbade me that I should recite (the Qur'an) in a state of bowing and prostration.
[976]
This hadith has been narrated by some other narrators, Ibn 'Abbas and others, and they all reported that 'Ali said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade me to recite the Qur'an while I am in a state of bowing and prostration, and in their narration (there is a mention of) forbiddance from that (recital) in the state of prostration as it has been transmitted by Zuhri, Zaid b. Aslam, al-Wahid b. Kathir, and Dawud b. Qais.
[977]
This hadith is transmitted on the authority of 'Ali, but he made no mention of "while in prostration".
[978]
Ibn 'Abbas reported : I was forbidden to recite (the Qur'an) while I was bowing, and there is no mention of 'Ali in the chain of transmitters.
[979]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The nearest a servant comes to his Lord is when he is prostrating himself, so make supplication (in this state).
[980]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to say while prostrating himself: O Lord, forgive me all my sins, small and great, first and last, open and secret.
[981]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him') often said while bowing and prostrating himself: "Glory be to Thee, O Allah, our Lord, and praise be to Thee, O Allah, forgive me," thus complying with the (command in) the Qur'an.
[982]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) before his death recited often: Hallowed be Thou, and with Thy praise, I seek forgiveness from Thee and return to Thee. She reported: I said: Messenger of Allah, what are these words that I find you reciting? He said: There has been made a sign for me in my Ummah; when I saw that, I uttered them (these words of glorification for Allah), and the sign is: "When Allah's help and victory ..... to the end of the surah.
[983]
'A'isha reported: Never did I ,see the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) after the revelation (of these verses): "When Allah's help and victory came." observin- his prayer without making (this supplication) or he said in it (supplication): Hallowed be Thee, my Lord, and with Thy praise, O Allah, forgive me.
[984]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited often these words: Hallowed be Allah and with His praise, I seek the forgiveness of Allah and return to Him. She said: I asked: Messenger of Allah, I see that you often repeat the saying "subhan allahi bihamdihi astag firullahi watubuilaih" whereupon he said: My Lord informed me that I would soon see a sign in my Ummah,so when I see it I often recite (these) words: Hallowed be Allah and with His Praise, I seek forgiveness of Allah and return to Him. Indeed I saw it (when this verse) was revealed: "When Allah's help and victory came, it marked the victory of Mecca, and you see people entering into Allah's religion in troops, celebrate the praise of Thy Lord and ask His forgiveness. Surely He is ever returning to Mercy."
[985]
Ibn Juraij reported: I asked 'Ata': What do you recite when you are in a state of bowing (in prayer) ? He said: "Hallowed be Thou, and with Thy praise, there is no god but Thou." Son of Abd Mulaika narrated to me on the anthority of 'A'isha (who reported): I missed one night the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) (from his bed). I thought that he might have gone to one of his other wives. I searched for him and then came back and (found him) in a state of bowing, or prostration, saying: Hallowed be Thou and with Thy praise; there is no god but Thou. I said: With my father mayest thou be ransomed and with my mother. I was thinking of (another) affair, whereas you are (occupied) in another one.
[986]
'A'isha reported: One night I missed Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) from the bed, and when I sought him my hand touched the soles of his feet while he was in the state of prostration; they (feet) were raised and he was saying: "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thy pleasure from Thy anger, and in Thy forgiveness from Thy punishment, and I seek refuge in Thee from Thee (Thy anger). I cannot reckon Thy praise. Thou art as Thou hast lauded Thyself."
[987]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (way peace he upon him) used to pronounce while bowing and prostrating himself: All Glorious, All Holy, Lord of the Angels and the Spirit.
[988]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha by another chain of transmitters.
[989]
Ma'dan b. Talha reported: I met Thauban, the freed slave. of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and asked him to tell me about an act for which, if I do it, Allah will admit me to Paradise, or I asked about the act which was loved most by Allah. He gave no reply. I again asked and he gave no reply. I asked him for the third time, and he said: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about that and he said: Make frequent prostrations before Allah, for you will not make one prostration without raising you a degree because of it, and removing a sin from you, because of it. Ma'dan said that then lie met Abu al-Darda' and when he asked him, he received a reply similar to that given by Thauban.
[990]
Rabi'a b. Ka'b said: I was with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) one night. and I brought him water and what he required. He said to me: Ask (anything you like). I said: I ask your company in Paradise. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Or anything else besides it. I said: That is all (what I require). He said: Then help me to achieve this for you by deyoting yourself often to prostration.
[991]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had been commanded that he should prostrate on the seven (bones) and he was forbidden to fold back the hair and clothing. And in the narration transmitted by Abu Rabi' (the words are): "on the seven bones and I was forbidden to fold back the hair and clothing". According to Abu'l-Rabi' (the seven bones are): The hands, the knees, and the (extremities) of the feet and the forehead.
[992]
Ibn 'Abbas reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him): I was commanded to prostrate myself on seven bones and not to fold back clothing or hair.
[993]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had been commanded to prostrate on seven (bones) and forbidden to fold back hair and clothing.
[994]
Ibn Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I have been commanded to prostrate myself on seven bones: "forehead," and then pointed with his hand towards his nose, hands, feet, and the extremities of the feet; and we were forbidden to fold back clothing and hair.
[995]
Ibn Abbas reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I was commanded to prostrate myself on the seven (bones) and forbidden to fold back hair and clothing. (The seven bones are): forehead, nose, bands, knees and feet.
[996]
Abdullah b. Abbas reported that he saw 'Abdullah b. al-Harith observing the prayer and (his hair) was plaited behind his head. He ('Abdullah b. 'Abbas) stood up and unfolded them. While going back (from the prayer) he met Ibn 'Abbas and said to him: Why is it that you touched my head? He (Ibn 'Abbas) replied: (The man who observes prayer with plaited hair) is like one who prays with his hands tied behind.
[997]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Observe moderation in prostration, and let none of you stretch out his forearms (on the ground) like a dog.
[998]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters. And in the hidith transmitted by Ibn Ja'far (the words are): "None of you should stretch out his forearms like the stretching out of a dog."
[999]
Al-Bira' (b. 'Azib) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said . When you prostrate yourself, place the palms of your hands on the ground and raise your elbows.
[1000]
'Abdullah b. Malik ibn Bujainah reported: When the Prophet (may peace be upon him) prostrated, lie spread out his arms so that the whiteness of his armpits was visible.